title,selftext,subreddit
Why are some men so disgusting?,"I can't clean after my man every single time. He's got no self care at all. And no care about everyone around him. 

I tried being patient around him. Seriously though, how do you keep up with such people?",men
You know how women have been moving away from male gynecologists?,Pretty much the same reason I don't want a woman spiritual leader ... they're awkward and voyersitic when dealing with the spiritual private parts.,men
Psychology Today: Positive Body Image in Men,,men
Gender equality doesn’t mean both men and women are equal in all areas.,It means we as a society should value the natural strengths of the two sexes equally. Men and women have fundamentally different innate characteristics and society has placed the abilities and strengths of men above women. This is why all the popular things in the world are mostly men-centric. ,men
girlfriend’s parents wants her to break up with me because of my race,"hello fellow men,looking for some advice here. Basically the title,they’re the strict asian parents kind and girlfriend is too scared and unwilling to stand up to them AND unwilling to break up with me too. what do i do in this situation? obviously I’d want the relationship to continue,parents or not,but she’s extremely close to her parents so she’ll never do anything to hurt them nor do i want to separate my girl from her parents,so is there anything i can do? Or is this relationship doomed and I should cut my losses and move on?",men
Online Gaming was the safe place we men created to escape the judgments of women,"It was a community created out of necessity for young men to escape the judgment and rejection of women. Where we didn’t have to suck in our gut, watch our langue and be supportive. It was where we could be as mean and hostile to each other as we wanted in an effort to gain a competitive edge in a death match...as men. 

I hear of women complaining about being harassed during online play... yep. Welcome to our world. We deal with it every day. You can too. ",men
what is your greatest shame?,its a one year and been fired from (potentially )two jobs ,men
Reasons Men Should Try Sleeping Naked,,men
Banishment of an acclaimed UC Irvine professor sparks debate over whether #MeToo can go too far,,men
"If you want to cherish these women, and treat them with kindness and respect, with love and care, so you can help and protect them, then follow these words carefully: CHERRY. . . CHERRY . . . HONEY . . . on a CHERRY . . .",,men
Designer Indian Sherwani For Men Online,,men
A girl I work with,"A girl I work with texted me a picture of a tv they have in the women's bathroom, the men's room dont have any. This is sexual injustice. ",men
Why Men Should Also Be Concerned About The Future Of Roe v. Wade,,men
Men's Health: Men's sperm counts are falling because they're not exercising,,men
"Do you give a girl head? If not, why?",I am 22 yr old female simply try to gauge why women receiving head is fairly uncommon.  Was it the girl resisting? Or other factors that have stopped you in the past?  I've been in two long term relationships and the first was essentially afraid of it from his past relationship and my current SO claims he loves to give it but I can tell he only likes it when I get on his face and pleasure him at the same time.  I've been explicit with my current SO that I'm conformable with receiving and that laying down feels way better then the position he likes but I still find he won't willing go down on his own and I have to ask.  Not sure if I should be more instructive while he's down there to make him feel more confident. ,men
The New Rules for Men,,men
Do girls copy their crushes behaviours?,As I'm 17 yo I'm not the most experienced person when it comes to relationships and handling girls. Atm I have a girl that I'm in love with and I'm not sure if she feels the same about me. I've known her for a long time and we've hung out a few times lately and I noticed that some of the things I said and did a few weeks ago were kind of copied by her recently. For example we some discussions a few weeks ago where we clearly had different opinions and by now she completely adapted my opinion as if it was hers all along. First I wanted to ask if this is a sign that she may be in love with me (I'm pretty sure it is). Secondly I wanted to ask if this is a typical thing girls do when they have a crush and how I should deal with it because it is kind of annoying me as I would like to have someone with whom I can have a discussion and who also disagrees with me sometimes (I want her to have her own opinion).,men
Proposing in about 12 hours. Any last minute advice?,"We are at universal studios and I’m proposing tomorrow morning to her in front of the castle. I’m excited, nervous, and everything in between. ",men
Website called “Make them scared UW” run by University of Washington students allows individuals to publicly accuse people of sexual assault with no evidence,,men
NY Times Magazine: Is It O.K. to Press Your Spouse to Have a Vasectomy Before You Ditch Him?,,men
2 Men 1 Wax (Painful),,men
WHO/Europe | Too many European men die young from preventable causes,,men
Sperm Selection: Fertilization Not Random After All?,,men
The Pathetic Life Of Alan Harper: A Prelude/Warning To Men?,,men
Heavy Price of Being a MAN,,men
Real men store pee in the balls,Pee goes in the balls unless you're a woman,men
Uncircumcised penises get an unfair stigma of being dirty,,men
AMEN,,men
Shout out to men!,"I just want to say thank you men for being men! You are less dramatic than females usually, simply focused on one thing at a time, not jealous of me or caty and vindictive as my old women friends were. You are straightforward, use less words and are amazingly strong. Love all you mae friends...you make me have hope for friendships again.",men
Should men shave their armpits?,"So I know that being manly is all about the masculinity and never shave, but do some men actually like having armpit hair? Or is that something that we men should never shave?",men
Male Platonic Touch,"As someone who is not homosexual, and not in any way attracted to other men, I think that we as a sex should start with platonic touch such as hand holding or cuddling. Being touch starved feels terrible, and it happens to many single men who really just dont have anyone to give them affection in a platonic and friendly way. Us as men need to start generalizing that we can hold hands with each other without it being considered gay or scandalous. Girls are able to do it, and its not considered inappropriate or bad, so why not us? This is just a PSA, we as men should start showing some support to others in our life. Do it with a hug, or cuddle with them for a bit if they're going through something hard in their life. Make a homie feel loved. As a person myself going through depression, I can assure it would go a long way and make somebody's day. 
Thank you, spread positivity as always",men
Will you be my reddit bf?,,men
fixed it,,men
Media inquiry,"Hi everyone

I'm writing an article for the Guardian looking at erectile dysfunction in young people, and I'm specifically interested to speak with young men who are UK-based to get their perspective. I'm interested to look at different factors: how it affects your relationships / sex lives, how much you think porn is to blame (or not to blame), how it affects your confidence, and possible treatments and cures.

Can provide anonymity and answer any questions you may have, including providing credentials to show I am who I say I am. Please message me if this sounds like it may be you.

Thanks

Sirin",men
‘Male Menopause’ is hitting men at a younger age,,men
Shaving,"How do you feel about men shaving their legs? I got an injury that required constant taping, and after surgery required taping for support during sports. It has since healed but I was shaving my legs to avoid pulling out the hair every other day when I changed the tape. Kinda got used to the routine/feeling of shaved legs. ",men
Playboy Club Coming back to New York,,men
When she asks you what you're thinking about...,"...and you say ""nothing"". It doesn't make you sound complex and brooding. It makes you sound like a prick. 

Why?

Put yourself in her shoes. She's bored, notices that you seem occupied by your own thoughts, and wants to also be occupied by a thought. Telling her that you aren't thinking of anything is closing the door on her. It would make you upset. Now making her both bored and upset. 

Why does this matter?

The reason you say ""nothing"" is because you feel like sharing the stupid thought that you were actually thinking about (would you survive being hit by a car if you were inside a 10 foot tall marshmallow) would make her think less of you. You know damn well if you were out drinking with a friend you would ask him that. 

Go ahead and try to change my mind. ",men
The (Not So Secret) Sex Appeal Of Ron Swanson,,men
Just wondering will I keep growing after 16,"Right now I’m 5’7.5 and my mom is 5’5 and my dad is 6’2. Just wondering if I will keep growing past age 16 as I am 15 right now. I hopefully want to be as tall or close to my dad, he was always one of the tallest people in his school compared to me being one of the shortest. Just wondering if anyone knew, thanks.",men
Manliness,Fellas: what’s something you do that makes you feel really manly or masculine? ,men
"Seemingly low testosterone, is there something I can do?...","Now I know I need to go to the doctor, but the doctor won't attend me because of bureocracy due to my nationality, not even privately, I'd have to go to another country for that, and I was told I need to wait around half a year to get it sorted.

Long story short I know it was my fault, I got somehow seemingly poisioned with estradiol because of MtF HRT after a long time without healthcare, got heart issues, a seizure, bla bla, but then I happen to figure out myself that I had developed intolerance to the drug, basically using blackmagic with some sport equipment and the list of symptoms, either way I was right; once I dropped it, I was suddenly in much better health, I hadn't even know I was in such a bad state.

Either way I decided to live with myself and drop it, hard choice but what comes; and while my testosterone was low before all this, this time it must be seriously low or something; again using blackmagic fuckery and a list of symptoms; there seems to be something going on, all I can say is that the insommia, mood swings, sexual dysfunction, and random sexual frustration is really bothering me (I am horny but not really then what the fuck is it?...); and I need to do something with or without the doctors that don't give a shit anyway and just shrug because there is an issue with the paperwork and I won't die anyway.

Come on reddit, at least so I can get 8hrs of sleep every night like before, at least something natural inbetween, until the fucking bureocracy is done.",men
What Does it Mean to Be a Man? (Audiobook),,men
10 habits: How to be more attractive men (Part 1),,men
Do men like photobooks?,Trying to come up with a special anniversary gift for hubby and had the idea to do a photobook of us over the years. Do guys care about this kinda thing? I know it's something I'd like but I'm sentimental and squishy and he isn't. Any thoughts? ,men
A typical male suicide article was posted in a UK sub. My stream of consciousness response came out well enough to share:,"""The big trouble men face is not any culture that officially and explicitly doesn't let them express themselves, *per se*. It **is**, but not the way we're indoctrinated to think.

The traditional, stuffy and repressed masculinity is not keeping men quiet and bottled up until they explode and hurt themselves or others. That's a problem well in hand (save, perhaps, those men we are importing from cultures who are lagging behind in this respect). We have a very rich culture in the west of encouraging men to remain aware of and express their emotional states -at least we verbally encourage them to do so, and tell ourselves that we are good about doing this when we do it.

Men *are* feeling repressed and unable to express themselves, but it is the **modern, new-age, and progressive** cultural streams which are, by their behavior and their reactions to men's expressions and natures (which they *do* have; [{1}](https://youtu.be/tiJVJ5QRRUE), [{2}](https://vimeo.com/19921928) ), that is causing this (of course only in part but this is a very under recognized aspect of the equation, so it's overdue for singling out). Men are told to ""communicate!"", but the responses when they talk are shaming, denigrating, misunderstanding, and purposely ideologically gaslighting of the reality of male existence. And this isn't in reference to any expressed desires to hurt anyone or violate anyone's rights, as I'm sure some enlightened person will rush to correct me. When they simply express themselves in ways contrary to a new and radical social-constructionist, politically correct, neo-Marxist worldview, or express any of the many understandable grievances men have with the behavior of a woman they know, women in general (who do exhibit trends in thought and action which effect society, just like men), or the ""equality"" movement as a culture, they're treated as dangerous, threatening, flawed in character and virtue, ignorant and uneducated (innocently or otherwise), or outright leprous and evil. 

It is the isolation, the shame, the lack of family, community, religion, identity and meaning, and the misunderstanding and even hostility that they meet when they express this which keeps them quiet, bottled up, dependent on substances, short-term fixes, and unhealthy vices, and ends up killing them through overdose, misadventure, or suicide. The ways our mainstream narratives about men treat men are central here, and need massive overhaul. 

And the truth of this is **not at all** dependant on my ability here and now to propose solutions that anyone will accept, so before you try, that is not a game I'm willing to play. The ""what's your solution"" game is meant to shift the whole focus onto someone's ability to create perfect castles in the sky (impossible), rather than diagnosing the problem, and the inevitable failure to perfectly answer an unending series of objections and academic inquiries is then used as evidence of the failure of the whole argument (though it isn't evidence, it's a cheap bait and switch). I've met the tactic before, I see through it, and I won't entertain it.""",men
Mens African Braids Thai Style,,men
The 4 Stages of Masculinity.,,men
"Soy, single mom and feminism. Why males are becoming so effeminate.",,men
The Humor In Mutilating Men Versus The Atrocity Of Harming Women,,men
Guide for Platinum blonde highlights on black hair men,,men
Answering Girls Most Asked Questions About Guys!!,,men
10 Must Know pick-up Lines,,men
"Pfizer to lose patent of drug Viagra, Indian companies gear up with copycat versions",,men
Looking for someone to talk to,I dunno if this is the place to do it and I apologize if I'm breaking any rules of this thread but I'm an 18f just looking for a guy to talk to. Doesn't have to be sexual. Just someone to talk to and be friends with. I'm open minded.,men
This company is selling prostate massagers and other sex toys in an effort to raise money to fight prostate cancer,,men
Learn How to Conquer Fear from Beowulf - Man of 300,,men
Am i welcome,I am 15,men
"Hey guys just wondering what you all are shaving with. Straight razor, cartridge? If you could help me out that would be much appreciated!",,men
"Al Bundy, Circumcision, And Double Standards In Humor",,men
Basic Watch Buying Guide for Men,,men
"My friend sent me this pic, how should I feel",,men
Best facial trimmer/groomer,What the best facial trimmer on the market? I’m mainly looking to sharpen up my edges around my beard. I currently have a good Philips trimmer but it doesn’t have the detailing portion I want. I want the barbershop-like edges. What do you guys recommend? ,men
Mens clothing,Why do all shorts and underwear made for slim people? I am a little chubby guy and my thighs barely touch each other and after like 2 or 3 weeks the clothing just gets a giant hole on it right under my balls. And sometimes it can be seen from the front but sometimes it doesnt. And I buy my pants in which I would call a pretty quality shop. And i posted this here cause I dont see that women has the same problem.,men
The Other Orgasm Gap (Involving Men) And Why We Should Confront It,,men
First time on this subreddit,"This isn't any questions or advice, but I thought it was worth saying. I just found this subreddit for the first time and I just want everyone to know that its awesome this place exists. This place is so wholesome and nonjudgemental, every guy needs this",men
"hey ok,so this may be strange but...","people are so quick to arrest murderers,but in reality its not so simple,in fact i know people that have killed others,personaly should i call the cops.for one my cousin is involved with gangsters,and told me he killed at least 5 people.another cousin is an actual gangster,told me he has two guns,and killed people,infact go to any general gangster and they will tell you they killed at leats one person.another time i met someone was in the shak homes were the homeless stays,and i was smoking some weed, there,when a guy came in and said he just now shot two ladies dead,....anyways,murders are all over,and you meet some people tlike that.what should i do?im not going to call the cops on my cousins,and two,i cant proove were the bodies are,i simply heard it from them.",men
Recalling The Time I Felt Most Emasculated,,men
"What ""being a man"" is about","Feeling Bad
Thinking good
Feeling worse
Thinking better
Be",men
Apartment Decor: Need cool ideas,"I'm getting a new apartment, bachelor pad, give me any and all ideas to make this place look like the best man cave ever to exist. Ex. Posters, dart board, let's hear what ya got!",men
A lil embarrassed,So. I(15m) have recently started dating my friend I have known for a year. We live very close by so we always hang out. And since we’ve been dating I always pre-cum. ALOT. I could just be sitting with her and boom. Boxers soaked. Idk what to do and it’s going to be very embarrassing if she ever finds out. Any tips?,men
Ballon,"As an adult if another adult gave you a balloon how would you feel? My husband seems a little down so I got him a balloon that says your number one. It's just something lighthearted that I think will help him smile. He's working really hard 7 days a week and we don't have a lot of money with saving for a house.

I work as well and we are both paying off  debt and I'm waiting to hear back from a job offer. It's in between stage. Of getting where we want to be.",men
Is 14 cm small for a 15 year old boy?,,men
How to help sexually abused girlfriend?,"Hello fellow men,been in a relationship with this girl for a couple of months and she suddenly opens up about being sexually abused by her brother and physically abused by her mother. She has gone to mental institutions before because she has anxiety and depression but apparently they didnt help so she stopped going. This is my first time dealing with someone who has mental issues and i dont know what to do. How do i help my girl? Firstly im worried that she’d do something stupid to herself (i found old knife cuts on her body) i dont know if she still cuts herself but promised me that she doesnt. Secondly,im worried about whether her mental health is going to be the steering wheel in this relationship. 

Any advice is welcome. Thank you for your time.",men
Easy Tips to Approach ANY WOMAN !!! GUARANTEED,,men
Two questions:,"1) How do you properly clean your ears?
2) What is the right kind of body wash for me?",men
Do me ever feel threatened by an attractive guy?,  I know it's pretty common for women to get super jealous of each other but I don't know if it's the same for men. Cristiano Ronaldo took off his shirt and my friend thought it was so gay. I'm not gay but it's pretty obvious a guy like Ronaldo is attractive and my friend seemed jealous. If guys are threatened by attractive guys how are they treated different? What signs might they show?  ,men
How to confess to your crush?,,men
What It Means To “Man Up” And Why It’s Changing (For The Worse),,men
"Weird question, but who knows where I can find cool novelty socks.","^I'd ^also ^recommend ^not ^looking ^at ^my ^profile, ^this ^is ^my ^gross ^alt.

I'm interested some cool socks [like these](https://www.modsock.com/collections/over-the-knee-socks), but I'm struggling to find some that fit my massive legs. I'm 6 feet tall and have rather thicc legs. I'd prefer Amazon for there faster and more reliable shipping. 

This is the sizing chart I found in my shoe:

US | UK | EUR | CM
---|---|----|----
14 | 13 | 48.5 | 32

Can anyone help me out?",men
Top 15 hair colors for men!,,men
What did you do right after college and are you happy you did it?,,men
Voice deepened even more at 16?,"Why is this happening, I have facial hair, body hair, decent amount of muscle and an adam's apple. Now my adam's apple has gotten bigger and voice has deepened more. Have you had this experience at 16-17 years old? ",men
Cool look for summer!,,men
So...,So before I sub I just wanna know what it is exactly that you guys talk about. ,men
"I’ve grown more than 5 inches in the past year, and stayed the same weight. what’s wrong with me?","gone from 5’7 to 6’1, crazy growth spurt in the past year, but i have gained absolutely no weight, staying at 125 lbs the entire time. i can’t gain weight no matter how hard i try, and eat almost constantly. ",men
Any science behind beard/hair-growing lotions ? Does that work and is health at stake if using those ?,"I've come accross some products that promotes themselves as ""Organic Hair-growing oils"" but most of them doesn't show the ingredients. Like [this](https://www.amazon.com/Wild-Growth-Hair-Oil-Oz/dp/B000V8MTIC) one. 

P.S: [Here's](https://www.up-nature.com/blogs/news/top-5-best-essential-oils-hair-growth) an article I found online, if you're interested.

[Another](https://makeupandbeauty.com/7-best-hair-oils-for-faster-hair-growth/) one.",men
11 Red Flags: Are You Dating a Crazy Bitch? -,,men
This company is donating 10 percent of their profits to the Prostate Cancer Foundation,,men
"Masculinity, Mourning, And My Recent Loss",,men
Becoming A Better Man: A Lesson From My Father,,men
Precum(moral scrupulosity): update,"Hello there, 

So I have made posts about this before, but there is some update.
I do have OCD for those of you who don't know, which revolves around precum and semen. I have conqured most of my semen fears, but the precum issue remains.
My therapist and I came to the conclusion that bottom line my OCD revolves around moral scrupulosity, i.e. whether it is moral or not to leave some precum behind myself.
Now my only concern is when I might have sex outside. It is spring and trust me I won't be violating the law if I decide to have sex outside. I am gay and me and my partner both  leak a lot of precum. If we are outside hands go down and touch precum leaking when both of us are aroused and then those same hands touch other parts of the body, such as my hair, face etc. At home I don't have a problem, as I am taking a shower after sex, but outdoors that won't be possible right away. So I feel grossed out to be covered in precum all the way to home and being extremely cautious as to not touch my hair since there is probably precum there. My train of thought is"" what if I touch my hair and then forget to wipe my hands and touch something else?"" And then forget to wipe clean whatever I have touched? That causes me intense anxiety as my brain is telling me that I am guilty of being immoral and a bad person for not making every effort to ensure precum doesn't land on anything.
So what do you guys think about the morality of it all? Has anybody felt the same way as me, like a bad person for possibly leaving some precum behind? Do you even think of it at all? Why wouldn't I be a bad person if I do happen to leave some somewhere?

Thank you and apologies for the long post.",men
I want nothing,"I have no desire for anything. This happens sometimes, it comes in waves.
There are times in my life where I want nothing, no house, no possessions, no career, no spouse, no girlfriend, no friends, no family. Nothing.
I mean I want all of those things and I'm sure I'll get there once I figure out how to fight the good fight for the good life.
But right now?
I'm sitting on my bed and nothing appeals to me.
I have no sex drive.
I have no appetite.
I have no desire of any kind.
I feel like a piece of multilayer plywood that has soaked in hot water so long it's now starting to separate layer by layer.
Very fascinating but perplexing.
Any thoughts?",men
Silicon wedding bands a thing?,Hey guys I just wanna know do normal wedding rings really get in the way so much that you need to get a silicone one??,men
PSA for women,"Have any of you been previously told, in a completely non offensive way, by your man, that he could not care less and cannot form an opinion on a specific topic? For example- picking out cute shoes? Or “do you like this haircut”?? WELL, my husband has been trying to pick out a nice watch, he doesn’t ever get himself nice things. And I’ve okayed this idea.  

For WEEKS he has been showing me SO MANY WATCHES. I . Could. Not. Care. Less. About. Any. Watch. 

They all look the same to me.  I just told him this, and he turns to me and says this is exactly how I feel about most of the things you ask my opinion on. 

You’re welcome ",men
Premature graying?,Is it normal to start going gray in your mid-20's and it becomes very visible when you're 30?,men
The Wrong Way To Deal With The Incel Phenomenon (And Ideas For A Better Way),,men
Dad figure,"Hi I didn't have my dad around when I was younger, so had no one to give me manly advice when growing up, what advice would you give your own kids when growing up?",men
Whats One Thing A Man Wants And Needs Besides Sex,,men
Survey on gender related childhood experiences,"We are seeking adults to complete an online survey about different childhood experiences, particularly those relating to gender. Your participation will help us to develop a new questionnaire. We will also investigate associations between different childhood gender-related experiences and adult sexual orientation, gender identity and mental health. For more details and to take part please visit: https://www.surveymonkey.co.uk/r/childgender5",men
What's your guys' advice as to how to go about approaching a girl who keeps looking in my direction for a reasonable period of time in a public restaurant?,"I visited a restaurant a few months ago and performed a couple HIM songs at the open mic night. There was a blonde girl who also performed, likely mid-late twenties, and she seemed to pay extra attention to me throughout the night, without showing much interest or rejection one way or another. She even watched me leave as I walked right past her. 

I'm asking for any advice from fellow men who may have experience with this situation and how to navigate it. So as to either pick her up, get her number, or to avoid her in order to avoid rejection and getting shut down.

Thank you,
Hyperintelligentwolf",men
"How Dwayne ""the Rock"" Johnson went from evictions and struggle to making $65 million a year",,men
"Ever since I was a toddler I’ve always been stubborn and, honestly, a bit rude. Looking for ways to improve myself in this aspect","I guess I should preface this by saying I’m not a violent asshole or a bully. I don’t treat people like garbage online and I’m surprisingly good at socializing.
The problem is I’ve never been the nicest person in the world and I’ve always had this constant state of minor frustration to full blown (but internalized) anger.
I can be stubborn once every week or so and I can be pretty mean for little reason. Like I said before, I don’t necessarily lash out and I never shout unless it’s some douchebag annoying me after I’ve already told them enough times to leave me alone.
Anyway, I was hoping I could get some insight from some fellow gentlemen on how to achieve a sort of “inner peace.” Do any of you feel the same way I always do? If you do or ever have, what ways have you gotten around this?",men
8 steps to get Thicker Hair Men,,men
The best way to lighten dark lips!,,men
Profiles In Noble Masculinity: Hank Hill,,men
Precum:gross or not?,"Hello,

I know I have made posts about this, but I decided to make one last post about it. 
So here is the deal: I'm getting treatment for my compulsive disorder, I'm currently on abilify and on Zoloft and I am doing much better now. I am still worried about semen being around, but now I am more concerned about the pre-c** Basically when you're having sex there will be precum and we're going to touch our genitals and then we're going to touch other parts of our bodies, such as our backs and ears and hair, etc.  I don't have a problem with that as long as I don't have to leave right after I have had sex or if I have had sex outside and I cannot take a shower right away. Then feel very uncomfortable knowing that I am walking around with precum on my hair, for example which might be still wet. What if I accidentally touch my hair and i forget i have precum on it and then touch something else? Then I will contaminate stuff and I might forget to clean them.
So yeah, I wonder how many of you even think about this and understand where I'm coming from? Should I worry or not? What do normal people think and do in such occasions?",men
The #1 Mistake That Will Make YOU A BROKE MAN - MGTOW (Poor vs Rich) (Mo...,,men
Fellow men: Do you have a few minutes? (FOR SCIENCE!),"Hello everybody!

I'm currently running an online survey for my master's in psychology. Now I had a first look at the data and \- well \- there is quite a bunch of women but very few men \(3:1\). It would be awesome if you could help me change this ratio a bit.

It's about worldly wisdoms and dilemma situations and only takes about 10\-15 minutes. As a bonus you get the chance to win a 20$ Amazon gift card.

Thank you very much in advance!

[https://www.soscisurvey.de/wisdomanddilemma/](https://www.soscisurvey.de/wisdomanddilemma/)",men
Brutally Lonely,"I'm not sure this is the right place to post this.  I'm guessing it is, since the subject seems to be a male one and typing it out may make it better somehow. Seems to work like that for some people. It's a bit of a whine, so I don't expect that you read it.

So I've been single around 18 years with exception to a handful of dalliances in that time.  The last time I was with a woman was around 5 years ago.  She had some issues and I couldn't rightfully maintain a relationship with her.  She was a hoarder who collected coffins and a few other crazy things going on in her head. She didn't like that I was successful in my career. I broke up with her. Still, had I known that I would not be with another woman again I might well have put up with her nonsense. That fact is I couldn't rightfully stay with any of the women that I was with. Bad choices made because at the time I was so fucking lonely. 

I've tried dating online recently.  I might have received around 15-20 responses, and literally every single one of them was after my money.  One of them even asked for $280,000, and one of them sent me a picture of a cheque in my name for 598,000 in an effort to get me to send money to her. I mean how stupid right?  I was victim to the first one.  She apparently needed $100 iTunes card and when she asked, I got it for her.  But later she never showed up for our date.   I learned my lesson that first time and I consider that I learned it cheaply.  Still, online dating has shown only that the only girls interested in me are those who want money.  I tried another site and virtually every single note sent came back with: not interested. It's incredible how biting that is to be rejected without ever being seen. Every women I've ever asked for a date has rejected me. I'm relatively successful, in financial good standing, reasonable looking, can string a sentence together - I'm a programmer actually, have respect for women, and my life's pursuits usually turn out alright. But just I can't shake this awful feeling that I'm worthless.  Completely and totally. I just can't shake it. 

I eventually did have a couple dates from online.  One of them was a supremely large woman, and several others were without their own respect.  I couldn't rightfully date them further.  It would be a lie if I did, and for what? To spare me my loneliness?  No, that's not right.  It's not fair to them either.  I have never dated a woman that I specifically wanted to date.  If it weren't for the fact that periodically a woman asked me, I would never have dated.  I guess the issue is in finding and being with a woman that I feel comfortable with.  How hard can that be?

So I'm in my mind 40's now and I find myself thinking about me alone in my apartment.  Nobody's gonna know If perish in there.  It would be months before my landlord even showed up wondering where his rent was.  I'm tired everyday.  I feel like crying everyday - Breaking down and sobbing like a bitch. Sometimes I do, when something inside refuses to control that anguish any longer.  My head hurts, my chest hurts.  I don't feel like a man.  I've spent months working on getting myself in shape.  It's a miserable task.  Eating less.  No alcohol. Walking home - 10k steps everyday.  Lifting weight.  And for what?  Nobody's interested in looking at me.  This is not good and I'm so angry.

I hear and read stories of women who get themselves involved with bad men who abuse them, and I hate that.  I'm not one of them.  But I can't get a fucking date to save my miserable soul. I hate that as I walk through life, women look at me and are fearful simply because I'm a man.

So, I don't know what to do. I really don't see any fucking point to a stupid fucking existence. I just want to cry all the time.  On the train, at work, at home.  Anywhere and everywhere. my chest cramps and every time it does, I'm kinda hoping that's the heart attack that's here to end my misery. And I do hope it's quick. 

Well that's my complaint. Thanks for reading


",men
You know what’s fucking crazy,"Is that women talk about their breasts like it’s any other body part. I could imagine a conversation going like “....so i need to shave my legs again, and my boobs were feeling sore today.” Like, I wouldn’t openly talk about my magnum dong with even my closest friend because that’s weird.",men
"I’m 18 and I keep growing chest and stomach hair, I look like fucking Ron Jeremy it’s that bad, should I just shave it off or keep it? I feel like women won’t like it",,men
Not much people are focusing on men's bodies,Read this article to see what makes a man look attractive---&gt; http://www.sciencemag.org/news/2018/05/what-makes-man-attractive-hint-look-his-limbs?utm_campaign=news_daily_2018-05-16&amp;et_rid=345597637&amp;et_cid=2037598,men
"For Many Men, Seeing a Sex Worker Isn't About Sex — It's About Therapy",,men
When Your Lover Uncovers Your Porn Collection (And What Their Reaction Reveals),,men
Let’s talk about females! Lol,"Guys that are in relationships, do they still think about other females? Especially when social media becomes a factor. ",men
Contribute to prostate cancer research! Participants needed for online study of prostate cancer patient experiences. Prize draws available!,"The Sexual Health Research Laboratory (SexLab) at Queen's University is conducting an online study on prostate cancer patient experiences. We are currently recruiting individuals with a lifetime diagnosis of non-metastatic prostate cancer, with no other cancer diagnosis. The survey includes questions on diagnosis and treatment history, mental and physical wellbeing, sexual and relationship satisfaction, sexual functioning, and healthcare experiences. All participation and inquiries are strictly confidential. Prize draws available!

To participate in the study: https://queensu.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_8D08KGDJusm0qq1

To learn more about the SexLab: http://sexlab.ca
",men
Join the male club,"Hi, I run a blog over at [dapperesq.com](https://dapperesq.com). It's focused on lifestyle, fashion and family from a male point of view. In addition to this blog I am planning to start with a private community for men. This will consist out of a male group on Slack and weekly newsletter containing male focused stuff. Yes, including some exclusive erotic content \(no explicit content though\).

The reason I started this project, is because I feel the need for a place where you can be a man. Not in the way of ""I got so hammered last night"" or ""I got laid last night with this random chick"", but in a way you should not be ashamed to talk about stuff that bothers you as a man. I think that as a white male in my thirties, the pressure is rising. \(But let's not overthink this.\)

The community will not be free. You will be able to join by paying a yearly fee. Hopefully this will guarantee an engaging user base. At the moment I'm thinking a fee around $20 \(or €20 as I'm in Europe\). In return you get access to a self moderating male only community. And a weekly newsletter with adult content \(I'm currently scouting for female models\) and possibly some exclusive content and deals. This can be expanded later on with additional services or products. 

In the end I'm hoping to create some level of a gentlemen's club. The adult content will be similar to Suicide Girls \(clean erotica, but less alternative models\). But it's not my intention to let this grow to big, I'm aiming on a maximum of 500 members. But would like to start with at least 100 members.

**I would like to hear your thoughts about this idea. All feedback is appreciated.**

Also, if you like to join the club and try it out. I'm accepting free memberships \(for one year\) at this point to boost the community \(currently still empty\). You can send me your email address in private message, and I will send you an invite link to Slack.",men
Big difference between men and women,"I've noticed this over the years,  but I never really appreciated it before. It seems like women constantly ask ""well what do we do?"", sometimes derisively, expecting an answer, and men just have to figure it out. All my life, the women in my life have always had this expectation that I come up with the answer to sometimes unanswerable questions. I always say we'll figure it out. Does anyone else feel like this is a pressure placed on them just because they're a dude? ",men
The Epidemic of Isolation Among Young Men,,men
Anybody available to talk?,"I've been in a slump the last couple weeks and I need to talk to someone... just get some things off my chest, maybe get some advice, hear a different perspective, etc. Maybe someone out there is going through some of their own crap and we can help each other out just by lending an ear.",men
Dudes,"Hi
Can ask something
Is growing excessive facial hair normal
I have hair growing on my cheeks now for crying out loud?
It's like in the end of this my face might turm into a monkey or something ",men
5 Things To Remember When Growing A Beard,,men
Eating disorders,"I know that it's not really spoken about among us dudes, but who here's got eating issues?

\- I'm 19, about 5.10"" and 51.2kg. Just don't like eating. Makes me feel mad fucked.

Feel like this may be more common than i'm aware of. Waddup?",men
Man Up! A guide...,"Hello. I want to write a concise guide on how to ‘man up’. This is something I think I could do by myself but it could be interesting to see what other people can come up with, based on your life lessons too.

I’ve been told, directly or indirectly, to ‘man up’ maybe four times in my life, last night I was  jokingly told to do so because I was getting cold.  This got me thinking about the other times I was told this, and what those situations had in common with each other: lack of endurance.

Ok, so the rule is to come up with one word to describe what it takes to be a man. I’ll start with;

* Endurance

",men
Why do young men worship Professor Jordan Peterson?,,men
Any Bootcamp/Life Coach programs out there to help build up my esteem/break my shyness?,"I just entered my 30's. I am in really good (always striving for great) shape. Going by the attention I get (and have gotten all my life) I consider myself to also be very handsome. I work two regular jobs to fund my ""career"" which has been gaining some momentum this past year. I feel confident about my work and other things I can provide.

I grew up around a lot of females with my mother being the dominant force in my life. My father and step-father are great ""dads"" in terms of providing but they really didn't teach me ""how to be a man"". I've kind of done that myself. Thanks to the book, ""No More Mr. Nice Guy"", I realized a psychological flaw in myself that was put there by my moms upbringing and have gotten over it. Most of my good friends are females.

I've been trying to build better relationships with my male friends. Especially the ""alpha"" ones. It's tough but worth it to me in the end. 

My problem:

1) Confrontation. I always avoid it. I'm very zen like and am known to people as ""calm &amp; collective"". I dont make a big deal out of things and when something does bother me. I stay quiet. Then i find myself being passive agressive sometimes because Im always afraid to approach a confrontation without getting emotional. This connects to my second problem:

2) Speech. I have deep bass, slight speech impediment, and speak low naturally. A times I mumble. I have been working on projecting my voice, taking my time, and speaking a little slower so I can get my words out clearly. But when emotions are involved (during confrontations or when Im just nervous talking to someone of ""higher status"") all of that goes out the window.  

I plan to take up martial arts for the fact that not only is it a great way to stay in shape and Ive always wanted to do it, I also feel like it'll boost my confidence knowing I can defend myself in a serious confrontation. 
**My goal is not to become someone who goes around starting fights btw.

But I feel like I need something. Maybe someone to break me down like they do in the Army? Im not trying to join the military but is there something out there like that? A bootcamp for adult men to build them up? Should I just seek a life coach who can provide that? 

Im not an a--hole. Im striving to be someone who can deal with a--holes in a calm, collective manner with confidence. 

Just trying to be the best version of myself and a good man. Anything helps.",men
this is so true,,men
Time/Schedule Chart Based on Benjamin Franklin's,,men
"What are you guys’ ideal place where you like or would like to hang out with your buddies? Is it like a pub, a cigar club, a gym, a man cave, a garage, a game room or something else?",,men
10 Super/Terrible Sex Tips To Blow Her Mind... WOW!!!,,men
What i have learned,,men
Why Are We Keeping Up With the Joneses?,,men
Suffragette's advice on marriage goes viral,,men
Balls go inside my abdomen during sex?,"Basically what the title says. When I'm having sex, my testicles will literally go inside my lower abdomen. You can see a bit of a minor bulge where it nests. I can push on it, and it plops back into the sack.

My question is, why does it do this, and why has it just now started? I'm 22 years old and it's literally only started this year.
When I was younger (15-17) I was so sexual active, I don't think there was a time I was going one day without sex. And that frequently, I never had any issues with my testicles.

Now, my sex life is no where near that exciting anymore. Maybe twice a week... and that's pushing it with the ole lady... But now that it's slowed down, it's like my balls randomly started doing this.

It's weird to explain. I've researched it online about an over active cremaster muscle... RIGHT before ejaculation. But mine happens even DURING sex, it doesn't matter if I'm about to cum or not. They just decide to take a gander up in my stomach for no reason. 

Anyways, right before they go inside, my saggy sack gets really firm. My sack shrinks and gets really tight and closes into my body... Then when it can't shrink anymore, I guess it just shoves my balls inside me.

One of my favorite things about sex is letting my sack flop against my ole lady's ass as I'm giving it to her from behind, but I can no longer do that. I have to worry about my balls getting smashed while I'm smashing her. And believe me, when I make a hard impact against her with my balls inside, it hurts like a mother fucker, and it really just gets me out of the mood entirely.

I've bought a cock ring and it really does help. It keeps my balls outside my stomach, but the bitch gets caught up in my pubes sometimes and hurts. I just want a permanent solution to this shit. I'm so frustrated because it's just NOW started happening.

I've never had a hernia, I've never had a major kick in the nuts, or anything traumatic to my jewels. It's just so weird and frustrating and I just want to be normal again. Lol.

And it's not just sex, sometimes when she's blowing me those bastards will just take off as well.

Can anyone help me out here? Please?",men
The Art of Pragmatism: How to Find Opportunity in the Face of Obstacles,,men
“Battle of the Bulge” – How to start running when you’re overweight!,,men
How to DRESS WELL for men,,men
Contribute to sexual health research! Male participants 18+ needed for anonymous online survey. Prize draws available.,"The Sexual Health Research Laboratory at Queen's University is seeking men of all sexual orientations to participate in an anonymous online questionnaire. The goal of this research is to better understand the sensations that individuals experience during sexual arousal. **We are currently looking for individuals who do not experience sexual difficulties to complete an online questionnaire.**

**Participants must be 18 years of age or older, and be able to read and write in English**. Completion of online questionnaires asking about bodily sensations and sexual functioning will take approximately 30 to 45 minutes, and we are offering entry in a prize draw as a thank you for your participation.

**TO PARTICIPATE Please visit: https://queensu.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_0lgRBYquI5a46LX**

This research project is supervised by Dr. Caroline Pukall (Department of Psychology), and is approved by the Queen’s University General Research Ethics Board.

For more information about the Sexual Health Research Lab, please visit: http://sexlab.ca

Thank you!
",men
Redefining Your Circumstances: Genghis Khan’s Rise to Ruler of the World,,men
How to manscape your junk (for noobies of the topiary arts),,men
Do Men gain anything from Marriage? | The Mens Hour,,men
Why it may not work with Russian and Ukrainian men? Are Ukrainian MEN BAD husbands?!,,men
Speaks on why women shouldn't listen to Derrick Jaxn (dating advice youtuber that caters to women) and why women are so hard to approach.,,men
My man cooked a 3 course meal for me yesterday for the first time. It was awesome,,men
Advice on how to be a gentleman with a woman who isn’t a lady,"I got a couple of female friends who I really like but they definitely aren’t ladies. They curse at me,
Make fun of me and one has tried to kick me in my future generations repeatedly. I give them the same kind of treatment in return (obviously without ever trying to hit someone) but they expect me to act like a gentleman. Any advice ? ",men
"For the circumcised, you can reduce chafing and restore sensitivity of your manhood with a cheap drugstore product you can buy anywhere",,men
11 of the best places to propose in London...which would you do?,,men
"Worn briefs all my life (22), just bought some boxer-briefs.","Holy cow, the difference is incredible.

I'm not really a clothing or fashion guy, and I've always just gone with what's familiar. In this case, my mom always bought me briefs when I was growing up, and I've continued to get briefs just because that's what I've always had. Lately, however, I've been getting a little fed up with my underwear riding up into my crotch and pinching around my nuts, so I thought, ""you know what, fuck it, I'm gonna get me some boxers!"" ...Except boxers seemed a bit *too* loose, and I don't want my junk flailing around and knocking about between my legs, so I thought, ""Boxer-briefs would be the perfect compromise. I'll get some of those.""

Well, lo-and-behold, I've started wearing them and they're *so* much better than briefs. They are the perfect balance between keeping everything in place and giving your crotch some space. Plus, they're sleek, form-fitting, and the ones I bought are all shades of *blue* which is my favorite color. I'm no fashion model, but wearing them makes me feel sexy XD

Anywho, if you're one of those guys like me who doesn't usually give a shit about what you wear, maybe spend some time exploring what's out there. As it turns out, feeling good about what you wear and how you look isn't just for girls :P",men
Tips on dealing with rejection and gain confidence!,,men
Why Nice Guys DON’T Finish Last (Or First),,men
Post circumcision,"Hello!

About 3 weeks ago I was circumcised (I am 25), so I still have about a week of healing left according to the Urologist, but was wondering what do people use to keep the head moist, so it doesn't dry out and flake etc. It is still really sensitive but I know that will happen in time.

Thank you",men
"My Domineering, Sexist Mother - I Need to Rant","My mother is sexist. 


She’s also a stupid bitch. That is, she is stupid, and a bitch. This doesn’t give me pleasure to say, but not being *allowed* to say it has made me absolutely furious, and I won’t be silenced anymore. The narrative of the day is “women are pure, innocent creatures that need to be protected from the dirty, evil men.” Well, I want to do my part to dispel this notion.


My mother is the most domineering woman I’ve ever met. She SCREAMS at me like no one else. Growing up she would SCREAM at me because she had to do my laundry. Then one day, after months of screaming about “going on strike,” she quit doing my laundry, and I learned to fend for myself. And it was GLORIOUS! There wasn't some crazy harpy screaming at me 24/7… Well after about a week, she tried to do my laundry again… When I wouldn’t let her, she started SCREAMING at me because “she’s just trying to help and I won’t let her love me!” So I let her do my laundry again, but when I complained about shrunken clothes, she started SCREAMING again! This time because “I don’t appreciate her love!”


Growing up, whenever I was in conflict with a woman, any woman, my mother would take her side, no matter how egregious the behavior. I had a female teacher (she was eventually fired for forcing a student to participate in gym class despite a doctors note) in grade 7 that lied and manipulated my grades downward, and would enjoy humiliating me publicly in front of the class. I told my parents and my mother took her side “that’s a woman in a position of authority, you do what she says!”


I have a sister that I haven’t spoken to in over a decade. Growing up she would say horrible things to me - “you should just kill yourself you fat ugly piece of shit” - and to my friends “all the girls are whores and all the guys are faggots.” She would do things like pour bleach on my colored clothing, effectively ruining it  My mother would excuse her behavior “OK she’s a special little girl going through a tough time right now!” Meanwhile, if something bad *happened* to me, I would be blamed and threatened with all sorts of punishments i.e. being kicked out of the house, grounded for months, sent away to military school, etc. MY sister was allowed to say and do anything she wanted to me, but I was forbidden from responding in kind.


After all of this abuse, I had problems with asserting myself. Well one day, my cunty sister, after she went on a vicious rant, asked me to fix her computer. I said no. So she went and cried to my mom, who wasn’t trying to understand my point of view, and TOLD me to fix it. I said no and stood my ground. Then my dad came home, and I don’t know what my mother told him, but he THREATENED me… and when I looked over at my mother, I saw a look of pure malice on her face. And in that moment, my mother imprisoned me.


Most recently, I had a female superior leak private information about me publicly, effectively destroying my career opportunities at the workplace… I was distraught, and when I told my family, looking for support, my mothers response was “Don’t worry about it, she’s just a girl.”


I was recently diagnosed with sleep apnea. The doctor told me that based on my history, my parents should have noticed it when I was very young… however, my mother simply blamed me for “being a bad boy,” threw ADHD pills at me, and finally attempted to enroll me in military school.


Publicly, my cunty mother will say unbelievably sexist things such as: “The problem in the world today is ANGRY MEN! They are the reason Hillary Clinton wasn’t elected!”


And


“Now that women are in charge of the education system, things are becoming equal. Women would never rig the system for themselves, only men would do that, because girls are good and boys are bad!”


And she plays the victim like none other. I’ve had countless members of the community approach me with complaints such as “Your mother loves you, and you make her feel bad, how could you treat her that way!?” She cries publicly, but is careful to only scream privately.


She has ruined my female friendships by secretly inviting these women for lunches/coffees - after I specifically told her NOT to engage with them when I’m not around - and manipulating them, telling them fabricated anecdotes that make her look like the victim. 


She has continued relationships with my brothers ex-girlfriends for YEARS after he has stopped seeing them. That is *extremely* strange behaviour.


I’m sure I have more to say, but I need to get this out... I guess I'll add to this as I think of more stuff, but I needed to get this out.


Thanks Reddit!
",men
Mens White Platinum Hair look of 2018,,men
Cutting my long hair without scissors (Before and After),,men
"Divorced men, how was your first post divorce date?",,men
What do y’all think of being the patriarch in the family?,,men
Balding thought,I use the moment the barber shows me how well  he has cut the back of my head to actually only monitor how my bald spot is doing ,men
Top 7 Reasons Why Men Should Sell Avon,,men
Precum semen aftercum,"This might be very weird to ask but it's been bugging me for a few weeks now and I can't take this anymore. I'm 16 btw and have OCD.

Whenever I masturbate, I take a shower afterwards but I stand in the shower for maybe an hour or two because I have to pee to clean out the aftercum which takes a long time and it's really exhausting.

Second, whenever I get horny I get precum. I fucking hate it. If it is in the day I take a shower to clean it but if it's in the middle of the nights I can't  (I have once but I woke up my parents at 4am and haven't done it since) and I have to go to bed with precum in my underwear. I can't touch below my chest because I nights touch precum and in the morning I need to take a shower and change the bed sheets.

I need to know if precum is dirty or not and I'd love to hear if you guys have any suggestions to help me. I have tried not masturbating for weeks so I don't have to take these long showers but I always go back to masturbating. Most of all it's the after and precum that fucks me. My parents are really worried for me and they always ask me to get out of the shower and they always ask me why I shower for so long but i always give them excuses like I was taking a shit and needed to shower or that I just like showing alot.

Thank you.",men
Fight Back: Use #HimToo to Bring Sex Harassment Charges Against Women,,men
How do you boost S/O confidence after weight gain?,"Is the holidays. Your girlfriend/wife/fiancé, who is normally hot as hell, gains some seasonal weight and becomes self conscious when it comes to sex. How do you restore her confidence? What do you tell her?",men
How can I search a book about long range chit chat and how to steer it from beef to tease women and how to find a good topic to talk with them and to start to zone them out?,,men
"Men of Reddit, if you recently got engaged, how would you feel if your fiancée got you a engagement ring for Christmas?","So as the title says, my [F,23] SO [M,32] proposed to me 3 months ago. I thought it would be nice for me to give him a ring to wear until we get married in two years, so kind of like an engagement ring. 

It would be a titanium dark band or a silver band, plain with no diamond. It would look different to a wedding band so as to make it special when we do get married.

As a guy, would you prefer to keep this as a thing to wear when you actually get hitched? Would you find it weird wearing a ring while you are just engaged?

",men
Men will Be Men,,men
10 weird facts about beards you didn’t know,,men
Terry Crews: 'Men Need to Hold Other Men Accountable',,men
Reforming MGTOW ideas and groups,"There are good stuff to take from basic MGTOW, but a lot of what's in those MGTOW forums are misogynistic, which makes the good ideas in there (like helping men, advise not getting married or to get married knowing the risks, stopping double standard hypocrisy in the name of equality, some other stuff) seem bad.
What do y'all think about MGTOW?",men
Why is this true and what are your experiences with this?,,men
Guys education reform,Stuff like Guys Read helps boys perform better since boys are shown to do more poorly than girls in general in schools. What other ways can people help boys perform better in education?,men
International Men's Day: The State of Masculinity,,men
"Please post this to your social media profiles(s) to raise awareness, thank you",,men
"Men, tired of embarrassing yourselves? Read this!","Okay guys, listen up. Some of you might find this obvious, but I didn't REALLY comprehend this until my early 20's. 

As men, MUCH of what we do revolves around sexual desire. Basically, the catalyst for most of our actions is hormones &amp; testosterone. 

So, before you text an old girlfriend at 2am, or before you email your female co-worker to tell her you find her attractive, before you do ANYTHING rash, if possible, climax/orgasm first.

Essentially, before I do ANYTHING which could have possibly embarrassing ramifications, I try to climax/orgasm. If it STILL seems like a good idea afterwards, that means it's what you REALLY want, and it's not something being forced into action via hormones.       ",men
"How, if You’re a Man, to Deal With the Fact That You’re Probably Trash",,men
"Men, what would you think if you received a homemade comic figurine for a X-mas present from your SO?","I don't have a lot of money and my boyfriend is quite older and well off. This will be our first x-mas together as a couple. I want to show that I really appreciate and love him. 

He has tons of comic books so I was thinking of sculpting and painting one of his favorite comic book heroes. [Like what this guy does.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kayPzO3swTs) But not sure because it's not functional and he doesn't have any medium-large scale action figures or figurines in his home.  ",men
Bombfell makes it easy for any guy to style up,,men
"As a man, what's the most sexist thing that's happened to you?","Something someone did, said, implied, etc",men
Would this kind of guy be attractive to other girls?,"Ok so I was thinking tonight about a guy I kinda like, and I wanted to see if any other girls would think this guy was attractive (or if it's just me). He's average looking, skinny but dresses well. He doesn't follow the trends, he has his own style, sometimes a little edgy but most of the time subtle and well coordinated. When drunk he is the life and soul of the party, both men and women flock to him as he knows exactly how to make everyone laugh. When a bit too drunk he becomes even funnier, being very charming and a bit goofy/awkward. But when sober and even sometimes when drunk he becomes quiet. He will be caring, quiet and attentive, he asks you lots of questions about you and what you're interested in. He shows a genuine curiosity for the world around him. He's a deep thinker too, he will sometimes come out with some of the craziest, most abstract ideas but they will always be thought-provoking. I think he spends a lot of time thinking deep but I also get the impression he's got personal demons as he often seems a little distracted or sad, but never reveals why. However, he smokes a lot and it seems to be to relax him. Though he can be rather open, I always get the feeling he's holding back and/or troubled, I can never quite work him out. But despite this pensive side he never vents out to others or seems too distant, he gets on with everyone he meets and generally always has something funny to say. He loves humour and he loves learning. He studies languages but says that his one true passion is astronomy along with a lot of philosophy.  He cooks, loves being in the sea and he loves to drive fast cars. Is this kind of guy considered weird? Though my friends love him, I don't think he's that popular with normal girls. ",men
"If you are a fan of j Leo's ass( and I mean come on who isn't) check 2015's boy next door it ""her ass"" has some nice appearances clothed but nice",,men
First bj,Okay so I'm 19 still a virgin but my first BJ was in the back of my car in the mountains from a fat chick I met on tinder.  We made out and then she unzipped my pants and went to town.  I came in her mouth after about 2-3 min or something idk all I know is i came pretty fast.  Then we went back to her place made out some more and dry humped I couldn't come so she gave me a bj again and before I came in her mouth I said I'm about to bust and she jerked me off to finish.  It was weird she never called me back.  I texted her freaking out about getting an STD and she hated me and called me ignorant.  I was just young and scared.  Let me know your guys first experience.,men
"Noticed a lump on my right testicle, thoughts?","Before you comment, yes I have a doctors appointment scheduled tomorrow. Going to see what's up and go from there. Just wanted some thoughts from individuals who have also been in a similar situation. ",men
How to clean or wash men’s tie,,men
Electric Razor Suggestions,"Finally, at the ripe age of 25, I have begun to require a shave 2+ times a week in order to stay clean shaven (up until recently, I shaved once every week or 2, nobody ever noticed any difference before or after).

Dealing with shaving cream and the whole process annoys me, so I want one of those fancy razors that is rechargeable and has a stand that you leave it in that cleans it between use. My facial hair is pretty light colored anyway so even if these don't get as close, the trade-off in ease of daily use is easily worth it to me.

What should I get for myself as a christmas gift that doesn't break the bank, but is still highly effective?",men
Married men: same or separate bank accounts with your wife?,"Please explain your decision: why you have it that way, the pros/cons, etc. 

Would you recommend your choice to other men? 

Thank you very much. ",men
An Open Letter to my Brothers in light of #MeToo,,men
"Teenager, what deodorant should I use?",Is any random non brand name deodorant fine? I feel like sometimes deodorant makes me sweat more,men
Teenager seeking advice on growing facial hair faster...,"Not really a teen (12 y/o), but it doesn’t matter. 

I’m currently 12 y/o, and I already have a 1/3 grown mustache. I have an issue though, it’s not growing as fast I want it to. I realize as I grow it’ll grow too, but I *really need this*. 

I feel like I’m growing facial hair faster then all the other boys, so i don’t know if I’m *different*. I’ve kinda stuck to the idea that I grow facial hair faster because I’m Iranian (No, not a Muslim, lol.), and my ethnicity is middle eastern, and middle eastern people grow lots of hair. Yeah that was my logic a little while ago, I realized puberty was a thing, and I hit it much earlier then average. 

Anyways, getting off topic. 
Any tips on growing it faster? 

BTW: My testosterone levels are high, so that’s not an issue. Sorry had to clear that out, lol.

If you want a picture of my “mustache”, just ask me...",men
what are your biggest pet peeves?,"For me they would have to be the following: Jocks, Preppy people, Feminists, HARDCORE liberals, lgbt community, anybody that supports the lgbt community, Trump supporters, atheists, anti-gun retards, people against Christianity, bronies, soccer moms, classmates who won't STFU, and many many more.",men
What does it mean when the girl says 'i like your styles'?,"Basically, i walked pass her to pick up my food across the road while she was sitting on a balcony at Safeway. She smiled at me and i did back. Then when i got my food, i walked back to my car 'she said i like your style and gave me a big smile'. I was in such a hurry. I replied with 'thank you, you too'. Anyway, i extremely felt bad to just said that to her. I should have talked to her a bit longer. We might be friends or something. I just have no balls when it comes to girls. Im lack of confidence!",men
Lets Be Attractive to Girls,,men
"Men, do you agree with my vlog?",,men
How men use Vacuum Cleaner,,men
Now you know how your wife feels,"Just want to vent a bit. I do most of the grocery shopping, and most of the cooking. I like to cook, I feel good when my wife and kids enjoy food I made. My wife doesn't like to cook. Works out well for us most of the time. Hell it was the biggest ""dad"" advice I gave my 19yr old son, ""learn to cook good food that looks complicated, but is easy .. women love good food that looks like it took a lot of effort"".

Gotta have groceries to cook, and no cook worth their salt lets someone else buy their ingredients. So off to the store.

Shopping at a ""club store"" today (hell yeah bulk, 4 kids, two being teens! Gotta save that money). Shopping cart loaded. Dog food, ppl food, winter coats, restocking the spices and oils, 200lbs of sugar (we have an apiary, emergency feed for bees if needed). Cart was HEAVY. 6yr old and 11yr old in tow. Lady cashier looks at me struggling... ""Now you know how your wife feels"".

Wasn't sure how to reply to that without my kids around. It pissed me off. I wanted to say ""bitch, I do most of the shopping"".

&lt;/rant&gt;",men
Do men care about the size of a women's feet?,Just wanted to get a few people's opinions.. my friend is really self conscious over her feet and admitted to me the other day that she has hid her feet from her boyfriend since they have been together (4 years)!! I was shocked as I thought people didn't care about feet. She's a UK size 8 by the way ,men
Men's T-shirts Online Shopping,Men's t-Shirts online shopping website,men
Men's Sweaters,,men
10 Best Benefits of Morning Walk and Morning Exercise for your health,,men
7 Pieces Of Equipment You Need to Open Easy Home Gym,,men
Guys who were circumcised later in life: What do I need to know?,"In about a week I am going to be circumcised, and I'm just wondering what to expect.  Anything in terms of recovery (short term and long term), lasting effects, or anything unexpected would be helpful.  And horror stories are appreciated as well

Edit:  The reason I got it done was because when I got hard my foreskin basically put my dick in a chokehold, making getting and staying hard pretty much impossible.  Which is like 90% of its job.  So suck my still tender dick ya fucks",men
Do men regularly get pedicure?,"Do men regularly get pedicure?

----
My wife and dil say that men get pedicures often, my friends say no. Whose right?

----
|Vote Button| Poll Options|Current Vote Count|
|:-----------:|:------------:|:------------|
|**[Vote](http://redditpoll.com/vote/XeW1Cndk)**|Yes I'm a man and do it all the time|**0** Votes 
|**[Vote](http://redditpoll.com/vote/lGJ2Uxqe)**|Nope. Not my thing.|**4** Votes 
----
**Instructions:**

* Click Vote to Register Your Vote.

----
**Note:** Vote Count in this post will be updated real time with new data.

----
Make Your Own Poll Here **[redditpoll.com](http://redditpoll.com)**.

----
See live vote count **[here](http://redditpoll.com/poll/do-men-regularly-get-pedicure)**",men
"AskMen: my first suit, where and which one?","I'm going to buy my first suit and looking for recommendations. Should I go to a retail store like Men's Warehouse or Nordstrom? Should I go custom? Brand recommendations?

Max budget is $500",men
Why Dating in the 21st Century Sucks (and What to do About it),,men
Some advice for men when they meet a beautiful woman,,men
What to do if your man is not a romantic guy?,,men
Having a hard time shaving lately... (sandpaper-like skin). What's going on?,"I have a weird situation. I've been trying to shave – in the past, it has never been a problem using a normal razor (think the kind that comes in a package and can be used 2-3 times until they wear out) to shave my mustache, chin, cheeks, etc.

Lately, however, it's became harder, even with shaving cream. To the point where I dread shaving everyday. It feels like sandpaper, and I'm bleeding where I shave, especially under my nose. I'm not sure what changed. It also is that I have to use a hair buzzer to shave underneath my chin and on my throat, when a simple cheap razor used to work. I even try using shaving cream, but it doesn't help.

I'm not sure what's happening. My skin feels the same as it always has. I'm 31 and a male, if that helps. Any advice would be appreciated.",men
If a guy I don't know well ask me out and I say I want to be freinds first will he take it as rejection?,"I usually like to know a guy as a friend for a while before I go on a romantic date with someone. Dating right away is moving to fast for my emotions. 

But Im afraid when I tell guys this they think I am not interested at all.",men
"Entrepreneurs Love Their Companies Like Fathers Love Their Children, Study Finds",,men
"HPV May Be A Growing Threat To Men, Study Finds",,men
"Male Breast Cancer Sufferers Need Gender-Specific Treatments, Study Finds",,men
The struggle + a ban: all i did was cite facts,,men
Masturbation,Does jacking off shrink my dick and kill sensitivity?,men
"Gentleman Daily - Sports, Business, Betting and Women",,men
"Men, ways to spice up your Valentine's Day!",,men
Me,,men
Libido boosters that work?,"Looking for opinions regarding natural libido boosters (not testosterone or hgh).  Macca, deer antler velver, etc...",men
Zinc and Vitamin C (taken together to increase absorption) boost testosterone and immune system function,,men
A subreddit for the rights and issues of both genders,"We started a subreddit for the rights and issues of both men and women. Both the MRM and feminism sometimes seem self-centered and too concerned with their own rights and issues, instead of seeing the other perspective too.

Our sub tries to combine the both and is open to both open-minded men and women which want to exchange their gender-related issues and think about them.

https://www.reddit.com/r/mutualgenderrespect/",men
I feel sorry for the Husband,,men
Whats the name of the sub for men who believe they are superior to women?,,men
"Why being catcalled by men is scary for women, and why you won't get it by just exchanging roles in your mind.","Hi guys,

In discussions about things you wish you understood in women, I often see a lot of you guys writing things like ""I don't understand why women take cat calling so badly. I would be very happy if women complimented me"".

This really makes me want to highlight a detail you keep forgetting: You usually are stronger and taller than we are.

Of course you'd like stranger girls to compliment you. Don't you know, I love having stranger kids complimenting me, and i'd sure appreciate a skinny, short guy, doing the same.

But now, imagine. YOU are being complimented on the street, by someone way taller than you, and twice your muscular mass. How would you feel? 
Like some kind of powerless enticing quarry? Fearing that, if the stranger feels like following you around, you can't stop them? Wouldn't it keep you in alert because you just don't know what will be the stranger's next move? Yes, that's how we feel. We certainly do acknowledge the compliment, but the fear is just greatest and we get an overall bad feeling. And we are resentfull for those men to make us feel that way.

Now please, try to keep this in mind next time you find yourself trying to understand women being catcalled by men by exchanging roles. It isn't the same thing.",men
Women's vote,"This thought just came to me, but what if women never got the right to vote at all? Would this lead to policies that encourage women to work it out with their husbands instead of seeking a divorce knowing uncle Sam has their back? I know I'm gonna get slot of crap for this but in just that small way I wonder if anyone else had an idea about it.",men
"Go inside his head: Men's take on depression, loneliness and more",,men
Finally a website that understands me.,,men
Different coloration of semen?,"So, I ejaculated today and it seemed a little discolored, sort of darker colored. I can't say yellow or brown, but it seemed a little different. I have been reading and some say it is older dried blood. It doesn't have any different scent. I feel like I am being a little paranoid.",men
Do any of you men wear briefs?,I do. I just don't understand why so many men are against them these days. ,men
What men need to stop doing... sexist???,I remember seeing the post about what men wanted women to known about them and this seems to go against everything men were speaking about.,men
Pints for Prostates: Taking the stigma out of prostate healthcare,,men
Men vs. Women: Some ways we are different,,men
How do I extend sex withouth finishing too fast?,"I am 26. Full if life. I didn't really have this problem before, but after marriage i finish in about 1-3 minutes. I used to last 10 times longer before. 

After having a baby we have sex very rarely, i fill up my car with gas more oftwn that i fill up my wife. She says that she doesn't really like and enjoy sex. I dont think she's  cheating (track cameras and her phone location)

Any ideas why is that and how to fix it?",men
What the Length of Your Ring Finger Can Tell You About Your Masculinity,,men
Sign the Petition to make International Men's Day recognized by a Google Doodle!,,men
"Is it normal to have sex so fierce, your girl dies?",Help.,men
How do you shave? (poll + discussion),"Hey guys, please take this quick 1-question survey, I'd really appreciate it!  
https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/GJ96Z5J

Also, we can talk about shaving our faces and stuff, as we men shave our faces a whole lot more than womenfolk do.  

I recently switched from cartridge to safety razor, and I get far less irritation when I shave.  Also, I love not spending a fortune on those fucking cartridges.",men
Does Bosley hair regrowth treatment for men actually work?,"I'm 22, and already getting really thing hair. It's annoying because I would actually love a full thick head of hair like when I was 17.",men
Totally not my quote. Loved it anyways.,"""I have to be careful now that I'm prince of the wiener kings. When the chowder bobs are full and the energy is booming, it attracts the succubi who sense the energy and freedom. I will stand strong in glory of the wiener kings and yield not to the invitation to dine at the table of sins.
Onwards for years, let them swell and become casaba melons. The more chowder within, the greater the glory without. I played tonight and the energy was booming. I found the touch and the rhythm. Brothers of the testicle kingdom will also notice that rhythm suffers when you pull the meat or engage in the one armed bandit before a show. The longer you stew the chowder of the kings, the more you become like Ving Rhames playing bass.
If they can't get you with bonerization, they will try flattery to get a wedge in the door. Resist on all fronts.""


Also a tip to /r/nofap there. again, not me or my quote.",men
TIL there is a phobia called Caligynephobia : the fear of beautiful women. Does any one know someone diagnosed with this phobia ?,,men
White cyst and cut around Penis head,,men
Question: Do you shave your legs?,If you do I'd like to know why and how your environment reacts to it.,men
Do you know The Real Reason You're Circumcised ?? (Video),,men
Fitness model and Instagram star Lindsey Pelas reveals life with 30H breasts,,men
"Men, what do you bring with you on a night out?","I asked this questions in [/r/askwomen](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskWomen/comments/4ackf5/ladies_when_you_go_out_for_the_night_what_do_you/) and there were some interesting answers. Just wondering if it differs for men? Condoms, keys, lube?! Let us have the insight! ",men
How to increase semen load- without not masturbating?,"Is this possible? I have constantly have the urge to masturbate, I can't go a day without it. Takes its toll too apparently, with the amount. But is it possible to re-load semen while keeping up this habit? Drink tons of water?",men
"If you have a girlfriend or wife, how do you feel about her having close opposite sex friendships?",Are you fine with them having long private chats drinking together? What if he tells her not to marry you? What if that's followed by you getting pissed off and suggesting you don't want them to talk anymore and a missing you type music video shows up on his profile page and she admits that they secretly talked again in a chat room and he tried to hide evidence of it?,men
Inside the Brazilian all-woman village desperate for men,,men
Men who talk on their cell phones for an hour a day 'are twice as likely to have low sperm quality',,men
The first Viagra alternative in 15 years is... a dose of sound waves to the penis,,men
'World's first' home sperm test kit measures sperm quality AND count,,men
Sanders won 66% of male voters in NH; Hillary won 32%,,men
Is this a manly website?,,men
Urologists of Reddit,"Why is it that when i sit down for a long time... along with my ass feeling numb, do i also get a numbing sensation in my penis?",men
Balls hurt and can't get an erection,hi. so recently my balls have been hurting and/or feeling extremely uncomfortable I'd say for the last week and a half and I have no clue what caused this. I went to the hospital and they said all is good after being felt up twice and then having an ultrasound on deez nuts. just wondering if this is something normal then or what the fuck is going on. my dick can rise but it just doesn't feel the same or hard. In fact I can barely feel anything at the end area. I am 18 and not sexually active. Thanks in advance,men
"Uncommen - A movement designed to get men off the sidelines and into the game of life, where they can make an impact on family, friends and society as a whole.",,men
"12 Reasons &amp; Benefits of Growing a Beard &amp; Why Clooney, Steve and Ryan Had Them",,men
"beside sexual arousal, are there any other causes of getting a boner?","i read online that it can happen when a deep sense of relaxation occurs, which would fit my case cause it occurs during a specific event when im not aroused but i feel happy.  
",men
"My fellow men of Reddit, what's your favorite ""Go-to"" hygiene setup? Soap, deodorant, Cologne, etc","I usually use Head and Shoulders, Dove, or Irish Spring soap, Degree deoderant(sport) and I do 2 sprays of ""Red"" cologne. If you've never heard of Red, I highly suggest it. It's a strong, sweet smell. I also have an Arm and Hammer body spray. Doesn't smell anything but it helps my skin.",men
"Really talk, how do I help my little brother keep his hair so he doesn't lose it when he's 18 like my older brother and me? Give me some options.","I am hoping to prevent it ahead of time. It doesn't really affect me, I like my short buzz, but I want to help him keep his since he likes having long hair. ",men
Ten Things You Didn't Know About Erections,,men
Here’s Why You Need To Start Shaving With a Straight Razor | The Man Guide,,men
Do we need an International Men’s Day?(5 News) - MGTOW,,men
Men prefer smarter women - but ONLY in long distance relationships,,men
Here's Why the Laser Razor That Went Viral Got Kicked Off Kickstarter,,men
Cooler Review: Ice ‘Death Match’ Challenges with 90-Degree Heat,,men
"Fellow Men, I turn 20 today. What manly advice can you give me about life, health, relationships, money, eat?",,men
Guy Talk: No Man Is Worth Waiting Around For - The Frisky,,men
Man help needed - glasses,Any recommendations on where to find a stylish pair of glasses. My local eye shop just seems to have the same generic shit that everyone wears.  ,men
how to get him back- help,"I was talking to one of my custmers for 6months and never met him. in the beginning he was being all sleazy and i made it clear nothing like that was going to happen. we continued talking and after a while he began getting personal like, what do i want in a guy and do i think about a relationship with him and when is he going to meet me. one month ago, i was at a function and saw his cousin, so i sent him a pic of his cousin and we got talking again and i told him to come have a drink with me. he picked me up and we were heading to the city but i culdnt drink anymore. at this stage he said we were going to his place to introduce me to his mum and were getting marriad and he wants to see me again. he asked why i decided to meet with him and i said ""if i wasnt drunk i wouldnt have met him or kissed him"" he got offended but i explained that im pretty reserved and dont meet with guys at midnight let alone kiss them and because i was nervous to meet him. he then went cold as ice and shut down. everything in those 2 hours were perfect and had i not said that comment id be seeing him. i didnt hear from him and i asked why i havent seen him and he said ""maybe next time your drunk"" i called and he agreed to meet me to explain myself we set a day. that day i messaged him asking what time is good and he said he cant meet. I need help on what to do as i really like him and we have similiar values and so forth. I understand i crushed his ego as he is a real manly man.
can someone explain why he just shut me down and what i need to do",men
Men please Help- dating advice,"I was talking to one of my custmers for 6months and never met him. in the beginning he was being all sleazy and i made it clear nothing like that was going to happen. we continued talking and after a while he began getting personal like, what do i want in a guy and do i think about a relationship with him and when is he going to meet me. one month ago, i was at a function and saw his cousin, so i sent him a pic of his cousin and we got talking again and i told him to come have a drink with me. he picked me up and we were heading to the city but i culdnt drink anymore. at this stage he said we were going to his place to introduce me to his mum and were getting marriad and he wants to see me again. he asked why i decided to meet with him and i said ""if i wasnt drunk i wouldnt have met him or kissed him"" he got offended but i explained that im pretty reserved and dont meet with guys at midnight let alone kiss them and because i was nervous to meet him. he then went cold as ice and shut down. everything in those 2 hours were perfect and had i not said that comment id be seeing him. i didnt hear from him and i asked why i havent seen him and he said ""maybe next time your drunk"" i called and he agreed to meet me to explain myself we set a day. that day i messaged him asking what time is good and he said he cant meet.
I need help on what to do as i really like him and we have similiar values and so forth.
I understand i crushed his ego as he is a real manly man.
can someone explain why he just shut me and what i need to do",men
Question on a females actions I've benne dating.,"
Okay I'm here to ask all the guys on here. I'm a decent looking guy an plenty confident, always made it clear every time we chilled it was a ""date"".  I'm okay with social escalation an all that ish, anyways I met this 9/10 finest chick I met in a good minute an she's got a good personality. So I take her out I make her laugh I escalate slowly psychically then by day 2 we chill we start kissin an day 3 she calls me(she's a single mother an baby daddy puts her down blah blah) an we talk about BS an I talk myself into getting her into letting me come over for a Netflix n an chill. I told her don't expect sex I'm not that easy. We smash. Chill for Afew more hours I leave an she's texting me your best I've ever had immediately an texting me next day before I'm up what am I doing,ect. So I figure I got her bagged? No. Afew days later we chill an she says the sex was a mistake an she wants to reset to the point where we didn't even hold hands cuz she just got outta a 6 year relationship 4-5 months ago with a guy they planned for the kid she had now with him ect. I'm fucking stumped. I go to psychically escalate an she tells me it's too much too soon,ect. I tell her straight up I'm not looking to play games if your interested in talkin an possibly having a relationship tell me or I don't wanna waste time. She tells me yea she likes me an is interested but wants to go slow. Wtf? We chill 3 maybe 4 times after I'm still makin her laugh. Connecting emotionally an I'm slowly escalating with the touching again but it's not where it was an it's almost like she was a turtle an retracted her head into her shell. She calls me an/or texts me daily. What the hell am I to do?? I dig this chick an I can see myself having a relationship with her even tho I've never dated a woman with a kid. What am I to do?",men
Nobody Likes Change - Pocket or Coin Purse?,"Whenever I have change in the form of coins, I put them in my pocket. I was under the impression that every guy did this.

Turns out, all my male friends have a little zip up coin purse attached to their wallet, and they keep all their coins in it. 

So, gentlemen, what's the consensus? Do you keep your loose change loose in your pocket? Or do you have a zipped compartment on your wallet for your coins? Please explain your preference.",men
"Unmarried men, tips for you.",,men
Man[20] need to know if my chest is normal or I suffer from gynecomastia,Here is some pictures of my upper body : http://imgur.com/a/F0xN6 Please I want to get in a good shape and get a square chest.. Do I have that kind of body coz I am fat or coz I suffer from gynecomastia (men boobs),men
Men in Uganda using a bicycle to transport bananas,,men
How do I become more manly?,"I'm a transgender man, and I'd like some tips from you cisgender men on how to act more in a manly way. Is it in how you talk, or how you walk, or how you sit, or act? Tell me your secrets on manliness.",men
Can we talk about your mother?,,men
I Used to Love You...But I'm Good,,men
I'm jealous of all the male attention and positive reinforcement my gf gets and it makes me feel not good enough,"all in the title. with just about every girl I've dated I've witnessed guys throwing themselves at them and it always gives me the feeling like the girl is always settling. I know I'm not a bad looking guy and I do get the occasional crazy chashing me but nothing like girls get. it's a stupid feeling I hate getting yet I can't seem to escape it. I want to feel secure in my relationship but I also want to feel wanted I guess.

I know this is really fucking petty but this is how I feel and I don't know where else to speak about it without fearing real life ridicule",men
"Hey I am in need of some guys to do a quick survey, with money going to charity for each response. 18+","all about criminals and local communities helping them.

https://www.surveymonkey.com/s/localcrimesurvey",men
"So my wife asked me a question, and I don't know how to respond","Hi, guys. This is a really sensitive topic, and I wasn't sure who to go to or how to ask for advice, but here goes. My wife and I have hit a rough spot/patch. A couple months  ago we were fine; our 5thd anniversary was in September, and we decided, after a lot of planning, to finally have a kid. 

So, for the past few months, we've been trying to concieve, and we've even started outfitting our spare room with baby stuff (like a crib and shit). 

Then, on June 7th, she texts me while she's out: apparently she thought by ""kid"" I meant a goat! A fucking goat? I ask if she's serious, and she tells me ""yes"". She comes home and there's a baby fucking goat in her arms, wrapped up in a blanket. We've been raising the little shit for a while now, and I don't know what to do. 

I've been considering divorce, but I don't know how that'll hold up in court. 

And before you ask: I AM NOT JOKING. This is serious. I get it, it sounds funny, but my misunderstanding is driving me, and our marriage, into the ground. She set up baby monitors. She named it Philby. What am I supposed to do? I can't exactly google shit like this. ",men
"[Question about puberty] I'm 16 and obviously for a couple years now I've been getting hair all over, but I've noticed that my ass is the most hairy thing I've ever seen! Is this normal?",,men
Objective question,Can you slap another man and expect that there will be no retaliation.  ,men
"Divorce court yesterday hit harder than expected. Today, another problem to deal with.",,men
Research team needs your help to better understand how love and connections of all kinds affect health,"I am part of a research team at The City University of New York. We are passionate about the physical and emotional well-being of people across the entire spectrum of human sexual and gender identity. We'd love your help! Complete this 30-minute confidential survey if you:

    Are between the ages of 18 and 65
    Currently Live in the United States or U.S. Territories
    Identify as lesbian/gay, straight, bisexual, asexual, or otherwise

You will be helping us to expand the state of scientific knowledge about the diversity of human relationships and the impact of these connections on health and well-being!

Some participants will receive gift cards of up to $100 for participating in the study, as a thank you.

Click here to begin: http://hal.ccnysites.cuny.edu/

This research has been approved by the Institutional Review Board of The City University of New York. The primary investigator is Margaret Rosario, PhD. You can contact the research team at healthandlovestudy [at] gmail [dot] com.
",men
MALE G-SPOT,,men
"Throwaway, Erectile Dysfunction Question.","A throwaway for obvious reasons....
I'm a 26 year old physically fit male, and I haven't had an erection in over 6 months. I haven't been diagnosed with ED, but I don't have any way to go to a doctor, that and I'm a little scared to.
I want to buy viagra online. A friend of mine works for a Canadian online pharmacy that does 50% off coupons for poor folks and I told her I needed it for my asthma medication (I know, I know) 

Anyway, I have everything loaded in my shoppingcart right now, I have my 50% off coupon code, and I'm starting to get nervous.  Should I just go for it? What's the worst thing that could happen if I don't have ED and take it anyway? This is the stuff I'm thinking about ordering: http://canadapharmacyrx.com/generic-viagra.html
So its canadian generic viagra and not just 'viagra' so i dont know if this would effect it differently?

(oh..also, if anyone actually needs the coupon the code for anything it is '50%off' I figure someone might be able to use it.)
Oh..and Im otherwise healthy except for the occasional asthma attack.
Thanks in advance everyone!",men
Male Participants Needed for Online Study on Participating in Psychology Research,"Participants needed for online study on participating in psychology research. Must be 18 years of age or older and able to read and write in English. The study is conducted entirely online by researchers at Queen’s University in Kingston, Ontario, Canada. Prize draws for cash will be available to participants. Click [here](https://sagelab.psyc.queensu.ca/Checkbox/mint.aspx) to be directed to the survey (may take a few minutes to load). For more information about the MINT study, email **sagelab@queensu.ca**. This study has been approved by the Queen’s University General Research Ethics Board",men
Study Claims Coffee Could Improve A Man’s Sex Life,,men
Humility,,men
What Does it Mean to Be a Man?,,men
Why men under 6'0 NEED to wear lifts,,men
10 things girls want from their guy in a relationship,,men
تعرف على اكثر 7 وظائف تجذب المراة للرجل | ملف متكامل وحصرى,,men
BBC NEWS | UK | Human species 'may split in two',,men
Men's orgasm question,"Hello all, not sure if this is the right place for this question but here goes... So I was wondering if anyone had the issue of only being able to orgasm in certain positions during sex. For example I can only orgasm with girl on top with my legs tense and straight. I'd like to be able to orgasm in other positions but don't know where to start. I think it stems from masturbating sitting down for so many years (im 27). Every time I've tried google I find things about women but not men. Does anyone have info on this or tips or advice? It would be much appreciated, thanks!",men
Masculinity Is A Joke - Opinion piece on masculinity in the west.,,men
New Study Says Guys Prefer Slim Girls Like Taylor Swift Than Curvier Kim Kardashian Types,,men
Men who exercise have 'better sexual function',,men
"Finally, a Scientific Answer to Why Guys Love Round Butts",,men
Male fertility: Losing weight and cancer drugs 'boost sperm',,men
27 Daily mantras to Up-level life and feel like the bad ass you are,,men
This sub... my god,"It's like every second thread is some dude whining about women or seeking relationship advice. What the fuck guys? Seriously, ""men"". Let's be men, talk men stuff. Cars, bikes, sports, hunting, suits, power, money, building, you know, men stuff. Not a bunch of creepy stuff about how your pee pee was rejected by some vacuous twat. Man up for christ's sake.

Now, let's talk about racing bobbers down a beach. Which one do you prefer/?",men
My advice for life. If you follow this you will be happy.,"I've learned over time that no matter what's happening in one's life, it's better to appear upbeat. None of the following apply to me; my life is great. But-- a bit of advice for all you losers out there: Just lost your job? Or maybe you just hate your soul-sucking work? Had a personal setback? A bad day? Lingering unpleasantness, toxic people, emotional pain, your kale chips came out soggy? Don't tell your friends, your family, your lover, your dog/cat, or anyone else. They don't need to hear about that stuff. I don't care if you think your ""best friend"" is an appropriate audience. Swallow that stuff, get some sleep and pretend everything's fine. And it will be, as long as they never hear about it. Oh, and if-- heaven forbid-- your so-called friends ever come to you hoping you'll listen or commiserate over any of this sort of stuff, you let 'em know their feelings are invalid. Because wrecking your day with their negativity invalidates them. It's annoying, isn't it? Let 'em know. If they're not consistently brightening your day, cut them off.

Now, I know some of you might feel weird about cutting off communication with the people you live with, or people you've had a good time with, or whatever your intimate situation might be, especially if it's some tricky situation like that they pay all the bills or are in love with you or they need you to let them out of the house to pee in the yard, but I wouldn't feel bad about it. Friendship is about getting what you can from people. Keep the parts that benefit you (like, say, living with someone or having them continue to do things for you or whatever thing enriches your life) and discontinue the parts that bother you. It's win-win. They get to keep feeling good about doing something nice for you, and you get to maximize your happiness.

This applies to sex as well. Example: your partner wouldn't keep going down on you if she didn't get some enjoyment out of it. So if you're the sort to be thinking logically about your happiness, and you realize it takes time and effort to reciprocate, don't ever feel bad about not doing so. This maximizes your happiness-- why do something unpleasant when it doesn't matter if you do? Your partner wouldn't keep getting you off if she didn't like doing it. And we all ought to be watching out for our own pleasure. This goes for non-sexual things too. Since we're all watching out for number one, you can be quite sure that if a person keeps doing a thing, it's because it gives her pleasure. So she's got it covered.

If someone in your life complains that this makes them feel unvalued, remind them that happiness is everyone's own personal responsibility. That one can't go looking for other people to be the source of their happiness. If they think they're doing everything right and still aren't happy, 99% of the time, it's because they need psychiatric help (usually medication to overcome their clinical depression). ""But [you]!"" they might complain, ""[You] are important to me and I expend so much effort to make you happy."" This is a sure sign that they are seeking more from you than is acceptable. Again, it's an individual person's own responsibility to be happy. You are maximizing your own happiness, convenience, and pleasure, and you should encourage them to do the same, short of depriving you of any of those things.

Here are a few tips in case you think someone you benefit from in your life may get fed up and cut *you* off. Give them just enough. Drop a hint that what they want from you (emotional intimacy, love, sex, time, reciprocity, etc.) is on temporary hold. If you can point to some external factor making life ""just a bit difficult/complicated right now"" you've struck gold. If you can stomach it, pleasure them sexually for a few minutes. This is good for receiving months if not longer of conflict-free favors from them, and sometimes even granting a few seconds of oral sex can get them back on track for a year or more. Once in a while compliment your friends/lovers/etc. on something, but not on something that they really care too much about. They'll feel a strong desire to try to get you to notice something they *are* proud of and will be on their best behavior, but since you've complimented them, they won't be able to complain (See my first paragraph about complainers, and remember that cutting people off if they aren't making you happy is quite reasonable). If you rely on them financially, tell them once in a while that you ""couldn't do it witout [them]."" There's no reason to do this (or any other friendship/relationship booster shot) more than once every few months. Doing this more often can lead to bigger headaches, like the friend/lover/family member expecting more and more validation for their input. Remember that doing things for you ought to be its own reward. If it didn't make them happy they wouldn't be doing it in the first place.

These are just a few of the life tips I've learned, that allow me to be happy. You might wonder if I have any credentials, so-to-speak, and maybe this will suffice: I don't pay rent. Once every few months I remind a girl I used to have sex with (now it's just BJs) that we're best friends. I also tell her I couldn't do what I do without her help. As I advise, I do so *at most* every other month. This keeps her happily paying my rent for me month after month, even though I know it's a big financial burden because she doesn't make a lot of money. She has feelings for me, and often tells me that we'd be good together, but honestly I like things as they are and tell her so frequently. This arrangement/low-effort entanglement also lets me get frequent free restaurant meals from her, money for groceries and gas, free furniture and gifts, and periodically money for vet bills and travel expenses (I don't work, so I have a lot of time to go out of town for various reasons). The best part is, my life is my own. I barely even have to talk to her. A few unrevealing texts a day is all it takes. This sort of setup does require me to deflect questions periodically. As long as I don't reveal any deal-breakers (dates, etc. with other people, for example. I simply don't tell her what I'm up to, and everything keeps working fine). I can expect to keep this up indefinitely. Other things: I'm a pretty popular guy. People often tell me I'm good-looking, and I have a sunny disposition. Since I cut off people that want to bring negativity into my life, I never have to deal with other people's shit. That, along with so much open time to plan out as I like, frees me up to basically have as busy of a social life as I please. People beg me to hang out with them. Since I can only hang out with a few at a time, there's a great deficit for all the rest and they usually end up sending me messages about how great I am, which is a pretty nice boost for my ego. Let's see, good looks + personality + in-demand means I can get blowjobs any time I like from anyone I like. Sounds pretty good, right? 

Take my advice. You can be happy, get everything you need taken care of with almost zero effort, and everyone will adore you.",men
I'm looking for a woman.,"What I have to say about myself is very little. I feel I've discovered the number i for the first time... you know, the imaginary one, but that's not what I think about me. I love woman, just like every man should. men who love men? That's a difficult question, howmever I'd say I don't hate them. They're just people like women. 

A woman the other day said I shouldn't be left alone and I agreed with her. But how I know here, and how I know myself, what was meant between both of us, is only interpretable by either of us. She is a lady, but she may as well be now married. Children in all, and I'm still a virgin. 

Men of subreddit, I can't ask you, just like I cannot ask the women. I love you both, but attractions seem relevant. As far as tonight goes, I feel I should end this. But rant and secret posting? Which place have I posted? A place where somebody of both can place this particular thought? I wouldn't think so. ",men
Life as an ugly male,"Basically a lifetime of having **** forced down your throat, until you die and are quickly forgotted like the genetic mistake that you were. At least ugly girls usually still have desperate guys chasing after them. Ugly guys get no such privileges. We are basically considered worthless by society at large. The butt of every joke, from ""virginity memes"", to shows like the big bang theory, that legitimise the stigmatising of ugly men.

Take the life cycle of an average ugly man in western society. The ugly man grows up small and weak, with the curse of an ugly face and a small frame/short height. He experiences bullying on a regular basis, and has few friends, all of whom consist of fellow genetic lottery loser video game nerds. In high school, he is too skinny and/or short to do well in sports, so even if he joins teams, he soon becomes the outsider and eventually quits due to being bullied. He is forced to associate with other nerdy losers, and is treated like scum by girls and other guys alike. He watches the girls chase after the tall athletic lantern jawed hunk jocks, and faps every day after school while internally raging about how the jocks shoved him into his locker earlier in the day, and how the head cheerleader gave him a scathing look of revulsion when he tried to smile at her. He probably dosen't get to go to prom, as no girl wants to go with him. He instead spends prom night quietly masturbating in his room, tears streaming down his face. After HS, he goes to college, as his grades are the one thing that he perhaps excels in. Here he thinks he has found a golden oppourtunity- a blank canvas, a fresh slate. A place where maybe girls will like him, and he will finally get the respect that he has always been so cruelly denied. But he is wrong. He maybe stays in a dorm, thinking that it will be a great oppourtunity to meet people- maybe even get his first girlfriend! Instead, he finds college to be a more concentrated and intense verison of high school. He watches the girls still flocking to the tall tanned alpha jock bullies, and hears of wild stories about orgies and gangbangs that the jocks get to experience.

Maybe he dosen't even long for such things, but instead simply wishes that he was the guy he saw watching the sunset on a park bench with his gf in his arms. Maybe he longs even for a girl to simply like him enough to go on a single date with him. But none do. Just like in HS, he keeps telling himself that each year will be a fresh start, a new canvas- but it never is. Within a few years, college has disappeared like a rug being pulled out from underneath him. Suddenly, he is 24 with an engineering degree and a roof over his head that needs paying for. With his college graduation ceremony, his opportunity for a fun and fufilling youth is finally over. He graduated college a virign with few social connections. If he isin't a virgin, it is due to a one night lucky stand with a drunk fat girl, who was revolted at the ugly loser who she ****ed the night before, and promtly cut all contact with him. The only other exception is that the ugly man was lucky enough to score a 3/10 ugly and fat girl for a month long relationship. He thought that his days of loneliness might finally be over- until he found messages on her phone from a college frat boy, who had been ****ing her the whole time, along with half of the female population of the college. So there he is- a 24 year old man with little to no relationship and sex experience, leaving him unsatisfied and lonely, as well as only a few friends, who are also ugly and non social. Now, to make matters worse, he is forced to start working full time at an engineering firm with his degree, just to pay for his rent and food bills. The ultimate irony is that the jocks and popular guys of his college have better jobs than him now anyway, due to the lack of depression and subsequent motivation that they experienced in college, leaving them with better degrees and more social connections. Most of these ex jocks live in flash apartments with their college sweetheart, while the ugly guy lives in a ****ty apartment alone. For a few painful years he lives an existence of being a drone to society- a disposable worker bee engineer, working the 9-5, 5 days a week.

Suddenly though, in his late 20's, a new prospect shows up. An ex sorority girl type starts relentlessley pursuing him. She warms his cold heart with fake love and vanilla sex, entincing him in, lured the whole time by his steady job and paycheck. He knows deep down that she is only there for the money, and that she would have spat in his face 10 years ago if he expressed any interest in her. She tells him crap like ""I was soooooo nerdy in college, never went out and partied"". In reality, she went to exact same college as him, and was used as a plaything by the athletes every weekend, and even used to laugh with her friends at the ""weird ugly creep"" who always sat alone at the front of classes. That ""weird ugly creep"", now decides to marry her age 30. Soon enough, she has a few ugly children with him- all of whom will inherit the worst genetics from both parents and turn out short, skinny, ugly, and plaughed with genetic curses such as myopia and asthma. Soon enough, our intrepid hero is 40, and in deep depression about his life. His gold digging wife has revealed her true peresonality as a controlling, bat **** insane woman, who takes her anger at losing her looks out on her beta husband. He is deeply regretful about his life, he has only had a few friends, ****ed 2-3 girls- either ugly ones, or one after his cash.

Then one day, everything comes crashing down. He comes home from work early to find his gold digging wife in the midst of a passionate session of sex with his hired young gardener. He walks out the door, being too beta to kick his wife out. He checks into a motel for the night as he fumes over everything. Then, the final straw. He sees a young couple turn up at the motel, probably aged in their early 20's. The guy is tall, muscular and handsome, and the girl is curvy, blonde and beautiful. They are all over each other, kissing passionately as they make their way to the room next to his. He can't take it anymore. The young love that he was denied all his life, so curelly and rougly thrust in his face at his darkest hour. Our hero loses it. His hands shake with rage and hate as he fumbles open his container of OxyContin pain killers that he was prescribed for the chronic headaches that his high stress engineering firm job brought him. He pours the painkillers down his throat, OC 80 after OC 80 pill goes down the hatch, until he has consumed almost 50 of them, a dose far in excess of what any human could ever endure. He leaves the motel room, walking with a sense of purpose for the first time in his life. He knows that everything will soon be over, and he finds peace in that knowledge. The intense opiate come up begins to take over his body as he walks to the highway overpass he saw on his drive to the motel. The sun has set now, and the sky above is filled with the faint light of city smoke obscured stars. Arriving at his final destination, he steps up over the railing, and sits upon it. The lights of cars stream below on the freeway, filled with oblivious people, none of whom know his pain. The opiate overdose begins to take over him as he prepares to ket go of the railing and fall. His breathing becomes laboured as the huge dose of Oxycodone shuts down his respiratory system. Our hero takes one last look at the city lights and then puishes himself off the railing. He falls 125 feet to his instantaneus death upon hitting the freeway. A few cars swerve to avoid his broken body, and it takes almost 30 minutes for someone to call emergency services. Even in death, people still somehow know to assign him no value. So that is it. The stage is bare. Just like the unfortunate caveman of old, he has spent his entire life being exluded from the tribe, people sensing his genetic unfitness. Now, only in the oblivion of death, can he finally rest.

There it is my friends- life as an ugly male is hell on Earth. A death sentence of extreme loneliness, social ostrazition and bullying. it is like being locked inside a prison without walls, like being alive but dead at the same time. The worst part is that we are just expected to take it. Complaining about it is like breaking some sacred taboo. We are expected instead to just accept that we will always live a life of mediocity and isolation. Even for this post I expect to receive vast amounts of hate on here. I don't care though. Someone has to take the bullet to get this message across. If I were hot, I would never have taken the time to write the story above, I would instead be on Tinder right now, messaging girls and setting up dates. Then again, apparently looks dont matter and its all because I am a beta with no game or confidence. Sigh. In the words of Uselessgoodfornothing- I'll see myself out.",men
the power of pheromones,"1. jerk it (your body produces testosterone in your nuts)
2. collect ball sweat (has pheromone stuff in it)
3.mix with cologne so it doesn't smell absolutely terrible (about 50/50)
4. use as cologne (not too much)

placebo?pheromones?magic? i don't know, works for me though as gross as it is.",men
Call for research participants - Masculinity and Sexuality Study,"We are looking for men over the age of 18 years to participate in the [Masculinity and Sexuality Study](http://www.psychsurveys.org/kamclemore/ucd_mss) at [http://www.psychsurveys.org/kamclemore/ucd_mss](http://www.psychsurveys.org/kamclemore/ucd_mss). This research has been reviewed and approved by our ethics review board (#386947-1). If you have any questions, please contact the principal investigator Kevin A. McLemore, Ph.D., at kamclemore@ucdavis.edu.

Thank you for your time. 

Stigma, Self, and Social Identity Lab
Department of Psychology
University of California, Davis",men
"What's the equivalent song for Gloria Gaynor's 'I will survive"" for men?","I got divorced recently by a woman who I thought was my true love. My therapist says, it was naive of me to think that and I think it is a true statement. I'm very heart broken, all the work I did all these years to reach at this spot (before getting married and while being married) came to nothing. I did contribute to the divorce, no question about that, but my SO does not recognizes her part and acts as it is entirely my fault. 
I'm doing a lot to cope up with the loss (working out, reading, therapy, new interests) and I happen to come across Gloria Gaynor's song, ""I will survive"" and I was wondering if there are similar songs written for men?
",men
She has a boyfriend but flirts with me,"Like the title says she has a boyfriend but flirts with me,She has never said about her boyfriend I found out from a friend,She has sent me pictures,ask me to stop her house well her parents are gone for the weekend so it's not her just being nice and me being delusional. I'm 17 this is the first time this has come up for me,should I tell her boyfriend she is being like this or just keep away from her? ",men
9 THINGS ONLY GUYS UNDERSTAND,,men
This type of man puts the rest of us down...,,men
"Dear Reddit, I'm a straight man and today I had my first anal orgasm...well almost!","TL;DR: ITS FUCKING AMAZING!

So I read here on reddit (somewhere) about a man who has posted his experiences with achieving and anal orgasm and it kinda stuck in the back of my head. I read about the male gspot some more and then forgot about it, until today. Today was a much different day, I got off work early, went to the gym, came home and plopped down on the couch. For some reason, that post popped into my head. I thought what the hell, I grabbed a towel (definitely needed), some lube, my trusty laptop, and my girlfriends vibrator. I googled male orgasm, read some stuff, watched a youtube video, and figured what the hell, and so it began! 

I wrapped her whole vibrator in a condom and tied it off (to ensure easy cleanup). Poured some lube on it, laid on my back, put my knees against my chest and just kinda ""flirted"" with my bum hole. After a while I put it in, felt like a huge turd was suck, then slowly pulled it out and it felt like I was pooping. I was so worried I was actually pooping! You guys know that feeling when you have that amazing poop, the infamous no wiper, yeah, it was like that. I spent the good part of an hour watching random porn and just letting the vibrator do it's thing, no real magic happened. I got bored and then started slowly bringing it in and out, started off somewhat painful, then it got better and better and better and better...... I lost track of time, my legs started shaking, I couldn't physically do it any longer. My dick felt like it was going to blow it's largest load yet and then the lubed up vibrator slipped from my grasp! After that I decided to call it a day as it was an hour and a half into it.

All in all, I cannot stress how amazing this was. Best sexual experience in my life!

",men
Strange Growth On Dick (help),[deleted by OP],men
Who doesn't want to see pretty 'women' dancing?,"I mean, I'll ask the ladies, what would you rather see other than yourselves in a man? Dush hut vooda!. dusk hust... VOOD A!!!! (sorry, as I heard it in the moment... ) now I'm in the city. ",men
Sexual help for young men who are looking for one night stands but can't get a hard on,"I’m thinking of starting some kind of website around young men's sexual health and impotence who can't perform when they are supposed to. When you talk to your friends about it, what do you say? What’s the biggest problem around their failure?",men
13 reasons why strippers hate you,,men
10 Weeks To A Great Bachelor Party,,men
Study: Men who remarry really do prefer younger women,,men
9 reasons why you do not wear jeans to a strip club,,men
"If you're a ""nice guy"", you're doing it wrong","Nice guys always finish last. By the time Nicole gives you a chance, you will be be 27 years old, probably a virgin, etc. Meanwhile throughout her life time, Nicole banged at least 20 alpha jerk offs such as myself. Lmao at ""waiting"" for the right one. While you were waiting for ""the right one"", I was stretching that poocy out and nutting inside her ",men
Middle-Aged Men Die From Binge-Drinking More Often Than Young Ones,,men
Help with penis hygiene(uncut),I've recently grown mature enough to pull my foreskin so that the whole head is uncovered.Problem is that it's  dirty but it's too sensible for me to even touch or keep it under the shower.I wanted to write this in /r/hygiene but it's a wasteland.,men
Three types of guys that go to strip clubs,,men
I'm a guy with a few lady friends. This helps a lot and they shouldn't be telling the world about their lady problems,,men
An Open Letter to the Man I Met a Couple of days Ago and Will Never Date,"Dear Sir,

I want to thank you for entering my life. You have rocked my world like nobody else ever has.  I will never be the person I was before I met you.

I have to admit, I NEVER expected to encounter the Amazing You in a bar.  I've been married for over 25 years, and I'm going through a divorce. I've been out several times in the past year, had some hilarious fun, and some mind-numbingly stupid conversations, so my goal for the night was to simply have some fun with my friends, enjoy the band that was playing, (I've seen them perform a couple of times this year, it's always a good time), and maybe dance a little. I set my drink limit at 3 for the night, because again, I'm just out for fun, not a hook-up, hangover, and/or anything negative. I'm all about being happy, life is uncertain, and I want to enjoy it.

So, I was amused when you approached me and started chatting me up, ""accusing"" me of kicking my friend when I put my feet up on the higher rungs of her bar chair. I met your friends, whom I thought were hilarious, lively and quite genuine. I was having a great time with all of you, and at some point, I can't even target the exact moment, I found you incredibly sexy. 

Like, holy shit, I can't believe how hot this guy is, and that he's talking to me, sexy. That's hot.

It made no logical sense.  You have a beard, I am not a fan of facial hair. You weren't dressed particularly well (I'm a sucker for a man with great arms, wearing a short sleeved shirt, or any clean-shaven guy in a button-down) and your hair was as much gray as it's original color, but my heart started to race and I got weak-kneed when I looked you in the eye.

When a slow song started, I reached for you, took the beer bottle from your hand, and started dancing. You gently smiled, and went right along. We moved like we'd been together for ever, and it felt incredible right.

I think I pulled away before the song had ended, I literally was melting down inside.  All this intensity, all this emotion, I wasn't accustomed to this.  I had no idea where to go with this.  I felt like a kid who played with matches, and once she got the fire going, didn't know what to do next....but that's not the sum of it.  

I'm tired of watching people jam their tongues down each other's throats and groping one another, trying to find something that helps them feel alive.  And by the way, I understand the desire to want to feel alive, but I am at the point in my life where that feeling, that set of feelings, is savored when allowed to unfold, like an unexpected, incredible series of presents, each one awakening something new, something thrilling and something authentic. Not a fast-life version of ""get it done and move on to the next thing."" 

I wanted to savor the way your beard felt under my fingers, that's why I put my hand to your cheek (probably more than once, I know I was transfixed by your jaw line), I wanted to trace your lips with my finger tip before I kissed you, I don't even know why I wanted to do that, but I think it was to create a whole set of memories about the moment.  And that's not something I would want to do in a bar, with hundreds of people around us, that's something that is so completely private, so incredibly intense, I want to do that to you because I am moved by the wonder of you, not because I want to create a bar room side show.

As I write this, I realize that all the time I have spent doing yoga these past 4 years has taught me that living in the moment is incredibly intense, but it feels amazing.  It creates a depth and intensity of life experiences that is thrilling and compelling. And absent this chance encounter with you, I may not have figured this out, so I sincerely thank you for that.

I need to also tell you how my heart raced when I was standing next to you, feeling the presence of you while you talked to one of your friends, but when I instinctively reached for your hand, you held it in your own, as if we'd been standing side by side holding hands for ever.  I need to savor that feeling, it was so new to me. I felt loved, safe and comfortable all at the same time, and it was intoxicating.

Don't mistake my inability to look you in the eye at certain points in the evening as a lack of interest. It was the intensity of your gaze, and the fact that my breath caught in my chest that compelled me to look away, nothing else. I was in sensory overload, and in order to experience it all, I needed to pull back and regroup a couple of times.

For me, the most mind-bending part of the night was when I realized that we were standing against the wall with our arms around one another, low along our hips, and I don't even recall how we got that way. It was such an intimate, familiar way to hold someone, and that it came so naturally was simultaneously comforting and confusing.

I was sad to see you go, and I loved the ""hug and kiss"" line from your friends, and was too caught up in the quickness of it to pause and give you a proper goodnight kiss when you, the last person in line, approached me. I didn't mean to turn and offer my cheek instead of my lips, it just happened that way. Again, I was wrangling a lot of feelings that night, and processing information was not my forte.

I'm going to summarize this now, and move on to the next part of my letter to you. Thank you for being a gentleman. You opened up parts of me that I didn't know I had inside of me.  Thank you also for the most intimate night of my life.  Intimacy isn't sex, it's a connection, a force of nature, and it is incredibly powerful.  Thank you for helping me to feel that intense power, I now know what I need to find in my life. A million Thank Yous for this.

Finally, I need to explain to you why I won't seek you out, despite desperately wanting to explore the curve of your lips, kiss you, taste you, feel your body pressed against mine, and even just talk to you, understand you and why I am so attracted to you - not to find the fault in it, but to savor it, to know you and understand this connection so that I can most fully cherish it.

The woman who I was at the bar with that night, I've known her for years, and I've had some experiences with her that have taught me (clearly not very well, because it took this night to make me realize her pathology) that she isn't completely sincere.  I will explain.  What I seek in the companionship department is completely different than what she seeks - I'm looking for interesting conversations about politics, economics, world affairs, travel, adventure travel, and intellectual conundrums. She constantly admonishes me for being ""too serious,"" and asks, ""why can't you just go out and have fun? Why do you have to be so smart all the time?""  Well, I am smart. And my mind feels alive when I'm having an intelligent conversation, so, yeah, that's just who I am.  I accept it, and I own it, and I make no effort to hide it. 

She is interested in whatever you want to talk about - your job, your sports team, what's on TV...in other words, she and I should, logically, be able to go out, meet people and each find what we are looking for without ""fighting"" over the same guy. Not to demean anyone, our target profiles are quite different, and I haven't ever seen those profiles converge into one person. Doesn't mean it can't happen, it just means I haven't seen it.

And while all of this is true in theory, in practice, it's quite different. What I have finally realized is that a man is most interesting to her as soon as she realizes he's interesting to me. And she is relentless in her pursuit at that point, and frankly, if you are capable of being fooled by her tactics, as I was, admittedly, then we are both fools.

She locked on to you that night, using her daughter's career as her wedge.  I didn't want to see it, I like her daughter, and I know how hard it is for kids to find a job in this economy, and it certainly was fortuitous that you work in the same field as her daughter, and I am all about lending helping hands. She used your kind heartedness as an excuse to get your phone number, which I found out later, but at that point, I knew it didn't matter what I did, she was going to pursue you with an intensity that you probably won't fully understand until you feel completely exhausted by her.  

You can read this and believe that I am a complete witch - who am I to judge the actions of a loving, single mother looking out for her child? 

I am the woman who got a text from her two days later telling me she was meeting you for drinks, and was completely adamant that she did nothing wrong.

I am the woman who left work to comfort her when her then-husband, exhausted by her drama and shit, walked out on her.

I am the woman who has met her in bars when she needed a wing-woman, despite being tired, and completely uninterested in being in a bar on a cold, snowy night.

I am the woman who has watched her 'friend' hi-jack three budding relationships with an emotional intensity that is admirable.  And completely unsustainable. And ultimately destructive for the relationship. 

I am the woman who ignored the fact that she has no friends in her age group.

That's who I am. 

I am the woman who has lived, and learned.

I am happy to report that I have asked her to never contact me again. I finally woke up to the fact that she isn't going to self-correct, and I am tired of trying to make this work.

I am so sad that I will never have the chance to know you better. More fully. More intimately.

But. I am so grateful to you for awakening inside of me the most extraordinary feelings and experiences. As I said at the start of this letter, you changed me, and I will never be the same person I was before I met you.

In closing I'd like to share something very personal with you. You are etched indelibly into my mind.  I hope I never forget you. I really hope I never forget the swell of emotions you created for me.  And make no mistake, you are my fantasy man.  Every night when I close my eyes and picture that scenario that will allow me to ""relax"", it is you who is there. So even though we never actually rolled around naked together, in my mind I'm doing things to you every single night that make you smile and sometimes even make your eyes roll back in your head. 

Wish you were here.

Hugs - Me
",men
I hate when women have facial piercings..am I only?,,men
"Thanks, Babies R Us, but I think you'll actually save a lot more than that.",,men
Women's voices make men's skin tingle,,men
How To Wear: White Jeans In Winter,,men
Top Menswear Instagrams of the Week,,men
"Brooks Brothers Hosts Thanks and Giving Events in L.A., NYC",,men
How can you forget,"I've been waiting all day to have sex with my bf, I've been sending him dirty text measages and telling him things I've been wanting to do and he forgets. IVE  tried everything and he decided video games and downloading movies was way more important and then when he finally decides to come to bed he goes to sleep!!!! WTF!!!!",men
"Men who suffered sexual assault, what are the reason you didn't tell anyone?","Hi guys, I am working on a paper to discuss the reason why statistics on male rape are severely under reported, so I need your help to understand reason why men don't tell anyone about the event, or how peope reacted when they did decide to share. For me, I had an ex boyfriend who shared with me that he had been assaulted by a girl older than him, and the best thing I could tell him was ""whatever, you probably liked it"". I was absurdly ignorant back then, but I'm trying to change that by raising more awareness for male victims of sexual violence. Help please?",men
At what age could you genuinely grow a beard?,"Not chin pubes, but a good ol' face sweater.",men
Men Find Women in High Heels Sexier and Are Nicer to Them: Study : LIFE : Tech Times,,men
What does your face say about you...?,,men
Science Proves It: Men Really Do Find High Heels Sexier,,men
"Is it okay for men to cry? I've just published this history of masculine tears on medium, thought I'd share it here.",,men
Blog - Männlichkeit stärken,Blog - Männlichkeit stärken,men
Rebuttal to “Who Faces More Rejection in Dating: Men or Women?”,,men
Who Faces More Rejection in Dating: Men or Women?,,men
What kind of guy...,"What type of guy turns down drinking, hot tubbing, and sleeping with his girlfriend? Then waking up and showering together.",men
"Doing some research on Men and poorly fitting baseball caps, care to help me out?",,men
Who faces more rejection in dating? Men or women? - Intro,,men
"Diseases, Conditions, and Hairy Situations that are exclusively for men!",,men
Men. “retreating – to advance.”,,men
hahahahah,,men
Dating After 40,,men
Herbal Care Products Treatment for Hydrocele,"If the problem continues after the first six months of birth, it needs to be removed surgically. But it is only treated in the way of surgery if it is causing discomfort to the patient.

http://natural-herbal-care-products.blogspot.com/2014/05/hydrocele-treatments-by-herbal-care.html

There are two ways of Hydrocele treatment:
-Surgical Excision: in it, the surgeon makes the incision in the scrotum. Sometimes, it is also done in the lower abdomen to remove the Hydrocele. Most of the surgeons also remove it while discover during surgery. 
-Needle Aspiration: it is the way through which the surgeon dries fluid in the scrotum by using needles. It is preferable for the patients who cannot undergo the surgery.

http://www.herbal-care-products.com/hydrocele",men
Men in Panties?,"Any men here wear panties? If so, what brand and style? Links please :)",men
Top 3 Sex Toys for Men,,men
Teaser 2: The Empty Nest Syndrome,,men
"Men be like you talk to much,",,men
Why Are You Carrying the Heavy Stuff?,,men
Best Shaving Cream | Male Grooming - shaving foam,,men
"Lads, the difference between here and /women is stark and shocking in the they be smarter than we are department",And its as funny as all get out. xD,men
Negative Canthal Tilt = Sexual Death Sentence,"99% of people with a negative canthal tilt are unattractive or average. So next time you post your face, look at your eyes and if they are tilted down, you are not attractive. Sorry...but its science :)",men
GUYS: could a 22 year old guy be looking for a real relationship?,I am a 25 year old girl and never dated anyone younger than me but I met a 22 year old guy last weekend in a club and we talked for 6 hours and kissed a bit but not sure if really young guys are just looking for a hook up for friends with benefits situation or is it possible he could want a relationship from this too? Just a general question about whether that younger age bracket of men do want serious relationships too? Thanks,men
"If a friend confessed to peeking at you in urinals or locker rooms or public showers or public saunas, how would you react?",,men
GUYS: How long should I wait for a guy to text me? Can I initiate a text?,"I met this guy at a club, he was cute, we spent 6 hours together talking etc and we kissed. He dropped me home. Then he texted me 6 hours later and we texted back and forth 4 times and then he replied one line to which I didn't reply. Just wondering how long should I wait for a guy to text me again? All my friends are stopping me from texting him.",men
Sexy vs Smarts - Rebuttal He Said,,men
Male Hotties,,men
WTF is this sub just one guy and his blog?,This could be a useful place. Come on!,men
5 Reasons You Should Have Sex With Your Husband Every Night,,men
'I'm Ashamed to Admit I Have a Problem With Masturbation',,men
Electric Shaver for men,,men
How to be a real man,,men
Art,,men
"The modern women can no longer cook, they no longer want children ...","and they are no longer warm, tidy and loving creatures who think spending time with their family is a good thing.

They are probably too “independent” and “strong” to even have a family of their own. The only thing modern women have to offer men today is sex. So instead of being loving housewives who cook and raise children, they are reduced to being sexual objects only – and they are so messed up emotionally and intellectually that they often spend most of the money they make on their jobs on Plastic surgery, cosmetics and tons of clothes they think will make them look good, in a desperate attempt to stay or become more attractive. Well, they have no other qualities attractive to men, so what else can we expect?

This is the fruit of feminism. The fruit of “women’s liberation ",men
Nikki's Blog - NIKKI RAE LONDON7/20/14 WOMEN WOULD YOU BE WITH A MAN WHO IS IN PRISON OR STICK IT OUT WITH YOUR MAN IF HE GOT LOCK UP AND HAD TO THREE TO FIVE?,,men
Here are the results from the sexuality/circumcision survey I posted here a couple of days ago,"A few days ago I conducted a short survey. Many thanks to all who completed it, your assistance was very much appreciated.

The results are in. Is there any correlation between sexuality and circumcision?

The survey garnered over 1500 responses, a number which I deem to be pretty darn good in terms of reliability. Roughly three quarters (77%) of these responses were from ‘mostly gay’ men, and the remainder from ‘mostly straight’ men. This is down to me targeting more gay-centric subreddits.

For gay men, 54% of respondents said they were circumcised, and 46% were uncircumcised. There is a slight majority there, but I don’t think it’s anything major.

For straight men, 57% of respondents said they were circumcised, and 43% were uncircumcised. Again, a majority, but nothing to shout about. I believe that in an even larger sample these slight majorities would be evened out.

There was no link between the age of circumcision and sexuality - for both straight and gay respondents around 95% were circumcised before sexual maturity (or realisation that they were gay).

Thus it can be concluded that there is no link between sexuality and circumcision. Some may say that the data show that being circumcised is slightly more common, but this result could be down to cultural aspects in the pool of respondents (I imagine a large amount of respondents were from the USA, where circumcision is thought of as more common than in European countries). Further surveys would be required to confirm these suspicions.

I would love to hear your comments on the data.

 - heyhogaybro
",men
"Men of reddit, could you spare a minute to answer 5 questions about your foreskin (or lack of one) and sexuality?",,men
I may need some help,,men
Seeking a male exhibitionist,"I'm a male voyeur looking for male exhibitionist.
Where might I go to find some? ",men
Master of my Domain,Am I really the master of my domain or am I merely a puppet in this great stage called life performing at the whim of a higher calling to execute precisely as it was written whilst it unbeknownst to me?,men
FAMILY; FAMILIA; FAMILLE; FAMILIE; FAMILJ…,,men
Any experience with hair transplant?Bosley?HairClub?,,men
Man Stuff blog,,men
"Guys, How Can You Avoid Temptation?",,men
"The depressing truth about women calling men ""creeps""","This is a pretty depressing truth. I wish it was not this way, but this is the way it is.

People say that you have to grow a pair of balls and approach a lot of women. Believe me or not, I've tried that, and for some people it simply isn't going to work.

You ever get called a ""creep"" by a woman for hitting on her/approaching? Well guess what?

I guarantee, if a good looking, handsome guy with a pretty face did the approaching, he'd be considered a ""charming man"". As for an ugly guy, if he does it, he'd be a ""stalker"" or a ""potential rapist"". If a facially aesthetic guy starts grinding on a hot girl, he'd be ""confident"", while if an ugly guy does it, he'd be a ""dirty pig"".

Quiet aesthetic guys are ""dark and mysterious"". While quiet ugly men are ""phucking creepy slimebags.""

I've approached a lot of women in my life and I've learned a big lesson, the hard way.

You're only creepy when you're ugly.

And sometimes I cry myself to sleep thinking about this, because it's a sad truth in life.

What I've learned is that maybe, instead of spending time to approach women, my time would be better spent getting a high GPA, developing my career, and saving up money for plastic surgery. And even if the plastic surgery doesn't work, at least my wallet can win me a trophy wife.

Maybe I too, can be non creepy one day. ",men
The Fleshlight has competition. The Autoblow 2 is here.,,men
"Prostate Cancer UK, Lifeline - BBC One",,men
premature ejaculation masturbation techniques,"I have premature ejaculation and I tried different masturbation techniques, mostly edging, and it seemed to help. I do not have sex often, but last time I did I lasted a very long time. I continued edging. Now I masturbate but recently some switch happened. I can't reach the point of no return and stop it, now what happens is that I reach the point of no return, orgasm but stop the cum from coming out (I guess like a dry orgasm?). At first I thought this was good, like really being to reach the point of no return, orgasm, and still be able to continue masturbating afterwards. But now I think its not good because every time i get close to the point of no return I orgasm, and it is much harder to stop this than before when i did not orgasm. It takes a lot more effort. I would prefer to be able to do both, at will. Anyone experience this and or have tips as to be able to not (dry) orgasm every time i get close to point of no return?",men
Happy Birthday Mary KAte And Ashley!,"How many of you men remember jerking off them :)

In celebration post the hottest photo of them you can find!",men
"Men over 30, I have a personal question.","So when I was in highschool, my sex-ed/health class led me to believe that I would start to lose my sex drive after 30. I'm 33 now, and I'm finding the opposite to be true. It's worse than when I was a teenager. Should I be concerned about a tumor pushing on some part of my brain or something? Or was my health class full of it, and this is normal? Your thoughts/experience?",men
The perfect body? How eating disorders and body image are a threat to men’s health,,men
CHRONICLES OF A DIVORCED DAD: The Dating Scene in 2014,,men
Dating Scene Basics from a Grown Man,,men
Pumpkin smell is found to arouse men!!!,,men
What do you guys use to get rid of swamp ass/nuts?,"Yeah I know, powder and all, but what happens when you have a days worth of powder on your junk and your lady wants to go downtown? That can't be a pleasant taste.",men
Constant pain in my right testicle.,I have a constant pain in my right testicle that feels like blue balls. I have checked for abnormal lumps (my first thought was cancer) but there is nothing there. Has anyone else experienced this? ,men
Interesting video on the assumption of guilt about men,,men
podcast idea,"Dear world,

I want to podcast and I am looking for a guy who is my opposite to speak on men related stuff. I was in the military and yet I am a pretty left leaning guy now. Hit me up on twitter if anyone's is interested in talking for real.
@zonecoverageof3",men
Is this a normal guy thing?,"Hi men of reddit, wife here.. we have one toilet in our house, we are very open about it, the door is often open even when in use.. no biggie.  The thing is, my husband has this thing where, if he needs to pee when Im peeing or making girl magic on the toilet, he will NOT wait.  Even if its not an emergency and he could wait, instead he turns on the bathtub water and pisses in the tub.  (mind you, he doesnt scrub the tub, I do) so am I wrong when it annoys me? - I mean, sure peeing in the tub when showering is alright, I do it occasionally, but I find peeing in the tub when you could wait a minute to use a toilet to just be immature and unnecessary.  Is this a normal reaction.  I dont post here often so maybe you guys are of the women are always wrong persuasion, but... c'mon, seriously, is this just one of those things where, hes not necessarily to be bitched at incessantly, but its still kind of childish? If it were you and a male roommate would you feel as annoyed as I do? ",men
Mind the bollocks - a feature I wrote a few years ago on checking yourself for testicular cancer. I'm not the naked bloke in the picture!,,men
The only reason girls will think of you as a creep,Is if you're ugly. If you're a good looking guy they'll think whatever you just did was cute. ,men
Is Big Brother Invading Our Bedrooms?,,men
Man Looking Intensely!,,men
Men of reddit is there a shaving kit designed for cleaning up pubic hair?,just curious on how other people besides me do it and if i could get a kit to help clean up some hair on my balls and around my genitals. (serious question) thanks for the answers guys!!,men
I haven't had an orgasm in weeks.,"I masturbate every night.

Sometimes I'll go a night or two without (this weekend I did because I had plans) 

But every time, I don't feel a thing when I ""climax"" 

I can feel it before it happens, it feels good to masturbate, but then I just cum and feel nothing. 

Is this a normal thing? It's been at least 3 weeks. ",men
Sex-Specific Drivers and Adaptive Technological Game Changers,,men
Five Differences Between a Grown Man and a Mature Man,,men
I need male participants!! Participate in my study examining perceptions of advertisements and be entered into a draw to win 1 of 2 $100 Amazon Gift Cards!,,men
Men More Evolved? Y Chromosome Study Stirs Debate,,men
How to avoid looking at girl friends' cleavage?,"To those of you who are attracted to women:
Have you found any techniques to not looking at your friends' cleavage or breasts when you're hanging out with them?
I was recently sitting with my friend and we were very close, cheek to cheek, and sometimes it was like there was a magnet pulling my eyes downward. I simply wanted to turn off the straight part of me at that moment.
anyway, do you have any tips?",men
10 interesting facts on the male brain,,men
2014 Men on strike: Helen Smith interviewed by Forbes' Jerry Bowyer,,men
Just wondering what the male perspective on this is...,,men
"Guys, if you want to increase your ejaculate and precum...take pygeum. Seriously.",Its cheap and I have been taking 100-150mg a day...and in only a few days the precum starts leaking if I even think of sex. Hell today after my workout I felt a bit of leaking out. Seriously try it.,men
Top Five Things for Men to Ignore If They Don’t Care About Their Health | Trusted Nutrients,,men
There are good men- recognize!,,men
"Teachers at Chase High School in Westcliff-on-Sea, Essex, to give schoolboys lessons on how to chat-up girls",,men
Attention all men: delete your Lulu profile.,"Just a heads up for all the men:

Delete your Lulu profile. Bitter, stupid, shallow and pathetic women are posting false things about men, so don't give them a chance to ruin your (dating) life.

This article describes the problem with Lulu (incredibly enough written by a woman!): http://www.huffingtonpost.com/sam-ressler/lulu-the-worst-app_b_4340750.html

You can delete your Lulu profile here: http://company.onlulu.com/deactivate
",men
10 Driving Tricks Any Self-Respecting Man Must Know,,men
"Deconstructing Anita Sarkeesian's ""I'll Make a Man out of You"" [Warning: LONG] jordanowen42",,men
"Does anyone know how to quickly make his balls to let go and hang down more? (the title isn't correct, sorry)","When it's cold you get the result on the right. Then it's warmer and you get the result on the left. 

My question is: has anyone found an efficient technique to make his ball sack 'drop down' like it's hot faster? 

It feels much better when I'm walking around naked at home. 

http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/2/22/HQ_SAM_ST2.jpg
",men
"Men of Reddit, please advise me re: my best (M) friend's prostate problem this evening",hi -- my best friend is visiting.  he forgot his Uroxitrol.  is there anything we can get over-the-counter that will get him through the next 24 hours or so?  i would rather rely on mens' experience than on advertising alone.  thanks in advance for your thoughts. ,men
"How To Test For Chlamydia, The Silent STD",,men
"Men of Reddit, I need some advice regarding underwear...","All of my life I have worn boxers as my primary underwear. I have literally worn them at all times at school, work, and even sports and have never had any problems with them. However, earlier this Summer I had gotten into long distance running and noticed some discomfort on my boys down south. I got it checked out recently and the Dr. believes it to be epididymitis and gave me some recommendations as to what I should do. He recommended that I don't workout/run in boxers.
So my question, what underwear offers the best support to keep my boys in place? I suppose I could start wearing a jockstrap but was wondering about compression shorts or boxer briefs if those offered more support and if anyone else has been in a situation like this.
Any help?",men
Basketball legend's advice for every guy,,men
Are there really any tricks to lasting longer in bed?,,men
Playboy Magazine Releases Its 2013 Top 10 Party Schools Rankings,,men
"Geeks, masculinity, and you",,men
Don’t Do Life Alone,,men
Complete Oversimplification of Male Reactions to Emotion,,men
"""Boys Dont Cry""",,men
Fashion A way of living,"It is a fact that men usually are not so sensitive about fashion thing. They consider it but not feel it like essential part of life. on the contrary women are fashion junky they live only for fashion. If you eradicate fashion from their life they could hardly live. This is the reason there why there is so much variety regarding women things following the phenomenon the more you adore the more you have.
But we can't say that we are deprived off for men clothing. There is also a large variety of clothing but can not be compared with men.[There are good men cargo pants.](http://www.nothingbutbrandnames.com/category/sp-cargo-pants) Similarly season to season varying dressing also circulates in men.",men
Early Diagnosis Benefits Of Prostate Cancer Symptoms,,men
Man Therapy,,men
Must for all The Gentlemen !,,men
Men should be able to walk away from a pregnancy if they choose to - a lesbians prespective,,men
Why Men Should Try Group Fitness,,men
A recent conversation with my girlfriend.,"""How long after we break up will you be friends with me again."" GF

""What the hell are you planning a breakup?"" Me

""No..."" GF

""Then why are you asking me this question?"" Me

""I want you to say something stupid so I can yell at you."" GF

Men of reddit... I knew it.",men
Why doesn't this exist yet?,,men
"Men, You Get To Have Your Feelings, Too",,men
Man Candles.,,men
"I need help, i did something terribly wrong! [Text NSFW]","Hello Men of reddit, I seek your wisdom.

Today I decided to shave my scrotum because it kept getting sweaty. So I thought of the first thing that came into my mind, my trimmer. 

So I trimmed it and when I stand up to walk it was all stubby and it hurts so bad when I walk, I decided to try shave it again and it looks like there is no hair but it hurts so bad like its stubby... Do you have any tips on what I can do to make my hair grow faster or make the pain go away D:? you have no idea what pain im going through..",men
Men don't gossip? Says who?,,men
Which razors offer the best value and a quality shave?,"As long as I can remember I've used a Gillette Mach 3, because this was the first razor my dad bought me. I'm considering changing it up, having seen cheaper blades by Wilkinson and King of Shaves, and even many other options under Gillette. Are there any particular models or brands that you find to give the best balance of quality and value for money?",men
The Secret to a Powerful Men’s Group,,men
"Put down the rulers, guys — whether your penis is the ""right"" size depends on the proportions of the rest of your body, a new study finds.",,men
Men of Reddit I need your help to dance!,"I've been chatting with this girl for the last while and she somehow got it  into her head that I'm a good dancer. To be blunt, I look like a fish out of water when I try and dance and I really would like to not embarrass myself in front of everyone. Can anyone give me some tips on how not to embarrass myself please? I've seen Reddit pull off bigger stuff than this before. Thanks guys.  ",men
Can anyone decode this girl's actions for me? (long story),"I'd really really appreciate it if someone could take the time to read this and reply.

Relatively long backstory, will try to make it as short as possible. I went to school with this girl, we'll call her Chelsea, for 5 years, 8th grade through high school, all at the same small school. 8th-9th grade, I was an asshole to her, because she was the first person I had ever met who could compete with me academically. She was really athletic and really nice, and everyone loved her. I was jealous, and I was a douche. It gradually shone through that I was obsessed with her. She got creeped out, things were bad. 

Grade 10 I dated a different girl, let's call her Lauren. Lauren was always concerned that in the back of my mind I loved Chelsea, which was, of course, true, but I didn't tell her that. Friendship with Chelsea improved because I was dating Lauren and so I couldn't be too obsessed with her.

Grade 11, broke up with Lauren, once again obviously obsessed with Chelsea. Chelsea asked me to run with her for student government. At this point, I'm really confused. She clearly trusted/liked me enough to ask me to run with her, out of all of her easily capable friends. She did most of the work, but I helped a fair amount, and we accomplished cool things together, like planning our prom. Spent some time together, all was good, but still clearly no romantic interest from her.

Grade 12, Chelsea starts dating Brian. Brian is a big sarcastic douchebag with an ego, but he's hilarious and easy-going, so he gave her some relief from her usually hectic life (as an all A student and very competitive athlete). I didn't really do much.. But our friendship strengthened some more because I hung out with her/her friends relatively often. At this point, having gone to a small school together for so long, we know each other really well. It's clear that we're good friends. I've made it known to her that I think she's one of the greatest people I'll ever meet.

We go to different colleges. She breaks up with Brian. We text on-and-off, but not often. We meet up over Christmas break with a group of friends. I maneuver my way into driving her somewhere (just the two of us). In the car ride, she is more interested in what I have to say than she has ever been. She is smiling, looking at me constantly, asking me questions, being an excellent conversationalist. She spills her guts to me about some of the things that she's been having trouble with in college, and I reciprocate (we had a lot of experiences in common). She ends up saying that she hopes that people like us (pooling me in the same league with her) end up doing okay, despite the challenges of school. At the end of the car ride, I park and we sit there talking for another 5 minutes at least. Before getting out, she repeatedly insists that we stay in touch, even shaking her phone at me. She even scolded me for not replying to one of her texts a few days before. She hugs me and wishes me well.

This might not seem like much, but she literally texts NO ONE. She is infamous for never ever responding. Completely ignoring everyone except her very best girlfriends. And just there she insisted we stay in touch. She emphasized it. She seemed really interested in me during the entire car ride, unlike ever before, and she made it clear to me that she recognizes me as an equal. 

We've been texting since.. Pretty consistently. I have an opportunity to take classes with her at a local university over the summer, meaning that I would spend a ton of time with her. She is literally my dream girl. Does this seem worth pursuing? Am I reading into it too much? Would I hurt myself by taking classes with her only to realize she isn't into me that way? I need someone else's opinion. This keeps me up at night... She's as close to perfect as I've ever seen. I had previously dismissed it as an impossibility, since she went to a different college, but she's an incredible person and I think she showed interest in me. This is difficult. :/ Men, help?

**TL;DR: I was an asshole to girl of dreams throughout half of high school. Eventually established friendship. We go to different colleges, meet up over break, she seems interested in me. What do?**",men
All the Single Ladies,,men
"Film exploring how cultural values influence men's sex roles is banned from festival, uproar ensues.",,men
Any of y'all use makeup?,"So, I had moderately bad acne when I was younger, and it's mostly cleared up these days but I have a few scars and blemishes that I'm not fond of. I was thinking about trying to cover them up with makeup, anyone here do / tried that?

The chemists near my office has a whole section for male makeup now... but I can't help wondering if it's not just the exact same stuff as women's makeup, but with a markup and something ""manly"" on the box?",men
Men Stepping Up – A Super Saturday Recap,,men
A Depressed Mind,,men
Understand the Man so You can Stand with Your Man,,men
WWYD? Woman abuses man in public,,men
Why Gender Equality Stalled,,men
Peace sign. Duck face. Sausage fest ,,men
How to hold a baby like a real man!,,men
Does anyone know where this male birth control is in the whole testing process in the US and Canada? ,,men
Deployed....,,men
What Every Man Needs To Know About The Ocean | The Rugged Male,,men
"Each year about 1,000 men died from the exam for prostate cancer - and the exams turned up a lot of ""false positives,"" resulting in prostate surgery for things which were actually harmless.",,men
Reddit for Men,,men
Father knows best as single dads tackle the other glass ceiling,,men
Changing My Life With Radical Honesty — The Good Men Project,,men
Uncrate-Where I've found way too much man stuff,,men
"""Dadchelor parties"" for soon-to-be fathers -- thoughts?",,men
"""The War on Men"": being raised to think that men are the enemy now.",,men
10 Shitty things about getting old,,men
The New Rules of Flirting: The Science Behind the Wink and the Smile - Men Overestimate Women's Interest,,men
"Congratulations on 1000 subscribers.
","I was number 1000! :D 

go me.",men
Movember: Changing the Face of Men's Health ,,men
Facial Hair Blues,"Hi there r/men! iv recently started growing out my facial hair to keep my face nice and warm over the bloomin chilly weather we are getting over here in Britian and i have a few questions... ehem.. 


Recently when shaving i might have pressed a little too hard with my electric razor as i wasnt paying attention and now i have a slight rash upon my cheek that doesnt seem to have really gone down in redness.

its almost like a spot but i know it isnt. 

is there anyway to tell if this could be a ingrown hair or simply rash from my razor? iv used both soothing balm for after shaving and facial scrub but nothing seems to have worked.


Any help would be brilliant. 

Cheers lads!",men
Guys Weekend Ideas?,"A couple of buddies (4) want to get together for a 3-4 day weekend.  Thinking the middle of November.  I was thinking activity based (Bungee jumping, fishing, etc), but I am open to anything!!!!  We are coming from all over the US, so something easy to fly into/out of would be easier.",men
"The NHL lockout and potentially lost season may be a boon to rekindling marriages and relationships. Or, alternatively, it may cause the disaffected fans to lash out and leave. ",,men
Sailor Portside Flask,,men
The Sad Truth about Male Friendships,,men
How to Tell if a Woman Likes You,,men
"BetterMen Wisdom Vol. 25 - A View from 10,000 Feet",,men
Spiritual and emotional maturity – the Sibling Society revisited,,men
A problem I'm sure many men can appreciate,"Had to go and buy some soap and shampoo/conditioner today. I have never bought it for myself before (first year of university). Went to the haircare section of the pharmacy and felt WAY out of my depth with all the fancy things various products did. Looked at a different area of the pharmacy and found a 2 in 1 body wash/shampoo for men and was like, ""that looks like a little bit of me"". Thank you intelligent marketers.

**TL;DR: Thank god for 2 in 1 body wash/shampoo**",men
Long Live The Manosphere,,men
"Man, Woman, and Self",,men
"Our modern false rape epidemic is created by casual sex, itself a creation of feminism, itself a creation of liberalism.",,men
Every Men Should Know This,,men
"The Peculiar Popularity of Pinterest – A Male Perspective
",,men
"Ancient people did not engage in Bonobo-like sex after all, says scientific review of ""Sex at Dawn""",,men
"""Workplace Salaries: At Last, Women on Top""",,men
Chapstick for MEN! J &amp; D's - Everything Should Taste Like Bacon:  Bacon Lip Balm,,men
Semen: Nature's antidepressant?,,men
Male Contraceptive Pill Moves One Step Closer To Reality,,men
If you have something to live for,,men
BetterMen Wisdom Vol. 24 - Of Men and Irony,,men
My husbands birthday,"My husbands birthday is coming up and I am absolutely blank on gifts that I could give him.  I am usually pretty good at this but I am failing miserably.  He likes video games, comics, superheroes, hes a daddy, he likes nerdy shirts and hoodys, electronics, diablo, skyrim, league of legends (this is his top game), he wants his office re-done, he likes drawing but doesn't know where to start when it comes to drawing comics, he likes really shitty d movies and he enjoys board games (mansion of madness, doom, zombies, that kind of stuff.)  If anyone has any suggestions or a subreddit that might be geared towards helping me come up with something I would really appreciate it",men
Would Like Some Advice: Bachelor Party,"I'm seeking some advice and a couple google searches turned up mostly articles on ""Will my boyfriend cheat on me at a bachelor party?"" and ""How to cheat on your girlfriend at a bachelor party?"". Not what I'm looking for. 

This weekend I'm attending a bachelor party for a good friend of mine (one of my own groomsmen, in fact) in Las Vegas.  I've never really been into strip clubs, and my bachelor party was more about playing golf and poker, eating steaks, drinking copious amounts of alcohol and smoking cigars, which is not to say that I pass judgement on anyone who is into them, certainly not my good friend. 

I'm really looking forward to gambling, drinking, eating good food, and even a little clubbing, but I'm wracking my brain trying to figure out what to do about the strip clubs. The other guys (who are generally a bit younger thab me) seem really into it, and I want to be there to make sure my buddy has a great time, but I would rather just chill at the bar and pay for a couple of his dances. 

Any tips on keeping occupied and not looking like a creep while avoiding the ""total"" strip club experience in an LV gentlemen's club?  The last time I spent a bachelor party in a strip club I felt like a dick taking up space and refusing dances. ",men
"Husband says he feels like I don't respect him and don't show my appreciation enough.  From a man's point of view, what can I do to show him these things more often and in better ways?","So in an argument about some other things, my husband brought up that he feels that I don't respect him or show appreciation/affirmation enough.  I feel like I put in quite a bit of effort to do so, but maybe I'm not doing the kinds of things that really get through.  Below are some examples of things I do to show both:


-Talking him up to friends/family (ex: talking about how he works so hard for us, how proud I am of him for working so hard in school, how awesome it is that he works and goes to school and does both so well, have talked about how ridiculously strong he is to girlfriends, etc)

-Write a thank you or something i appreciate that he's done daily on our refrigerator calendar instead of just crossing off the day

-make his favorite meal a few times a month coupled with a thank you note.  On those days, I usually tell him in a text before he leaves work that i want him to just chill and play video games or watch TV when he gets home bc i know he's been working hard all day

-generally let him pick whatever movie/show/netflix thing if we're watching TV, citing that I know he's had a long day and I want him to be able to relax

I feel like I'm just not catching on to whatever it is he wants me to be doing.  I genuinely want to make him feel appreciated and respected, but I'm at a loss here as to what else to do.  I thought getting some man perspective might help me come up with some good ideas.  

Thanks guys!",men
When guys are together what do they most often talk about? And what specifically about Hattiehat topic?,,men
BetterMen Video Wisdom Vol. 23 - Reclaiming Your Power,,men
BetterMen Wisdom Vol. 22 - Lose the Exes-Part 2,,men
Need some Manly Advice please,I don't know what's going on. I've can't seem to have sex for longer then 1 minute. as soon as i penetrate i am about to bust my load. sometimes tho i can't even get it up. and when i do i go so quick. is this normal? i'm about to be 30. i masterbate on average 2 times a day since i was younger. Please give me some advice guys. ,men
Male logic,,men
advice for a boy becoming a man,"while waiting for someone to finish leaving a parking spot, some smug ass drives in quickly before you can react.     when you ask ""wtf? why did you rush into that spot like i wasn't here"", he says ""i don't know what you are talking about"".   later on he acts smug and says stuff like ""enjoy your day"".      

i'm 38..  but growing up w/o a father i find i am still uncompromising and react poorly.    so i'm asking for advice on the best way to handle this situation.   i handled it poorly.   i would like to know a better way.  what i did isn't important since i'm asking for the better way to have handled this situation.     what advice would you give your son if he asked this?",men
Three men and baby,"What you get when four men go fishing and one comes back after having caught nothing.
This meaning the one that caught nothing is a baby at fishing. Or that he just isn't that good at fishing. ",men
BetterMen Wisdom Vol. 20 - JUMP!,,men
"So men of reddit, what are some of your favorite colognes?",,men
BetterMen Wisdom Vol. 19 - Stop Punishing Yourself,,men
"Controversial finding that will affect at least 44 million American men, a government task force has decided against regular prostate cancer screening.",,men
Change won't happen until you're ready to get uncomfortable. BetterMen Wisdom Vol. 14 - Get Uncomfortable,,men
Expectations,"So over time we all have our fair share of encounters with those of the opposite sex. For the most part it's grand. There is something however that I'm becoming more and more aware of. No matter the woman, i always expect them to be irrational. Now this is more than an expectation. I feel i have excepted that in my life women are just a little crazy. They act completely irrationally at times where a logical thought could set any qualms to rest. I just had a realization the other day that i accept this fact just like i accept the fact that sometimes it will rain. I am fully willing to put up with their craziness, and i fully expect them to be crazy. some less than others of course, but eventually, their rationality breaks.",men
The Library of Random Man Knowledge,,men
Study shows: Giving preventive drug to men at high risk for HIV would be cost-effective,,men
Considering a divorce?  One man's thoughts.  ,,men
BetterMen Wisdom Vol. 11 - YOU Are Not in Charge,,men
I stumbled upon this site while on facebook. brotips.com,,men
Men will relate to this,,men
"Empathy is a powerful skill - it can be easy to learn.
",,men
I don't think they actually expect anyone to do this...,,men
"Hello, Men.  I'm hoping you'll help me with a question about dating timelines and birthdays.","Would you be disappointed if a girl you've been dating for around a week didn't get you anything for your birthday?  I *JUST* started dating a guy this week.  I'm going to see him for his birthday and wasn't planning on getting him anything.  Now I'm overthinking it and not sure if I should find a small gift.

Normally I would bake him a cake, but I won't have time.  It's a 2.5 hour drive.",men
"Empathy – Men’s New Secret Weapon
",,men
"Male Y chromosome extinction theory challenged: Men may not become extinct after all, according to a new study.",,men
Does anyone know how to last longer?,"I was wondering if anyone had tips or anything on how to last longer during sex. Me and my wife always have to stop and wait for me because i almost go to fast... its really embarrassing and she got upset last night because i went in like a minute which was wierd cause i was drunk, also she asked if it was gonna be this way every time. HELP!",men
